Personal Data
PERSONAL DATA
CHRISTIAN DIOR PRIVACY POLICY (19)
PRIVACY STATEMENT - CHRISTIAN DIOR COUTURE
WHO ARE WE?
WHAT DATA MAY WE COLLECT OR RECEIVE ABOUT YOU?
HOW DO WE COLLECT OR RECEIVE YOUR DATA?
FOR WHAT PURPOSES ARE YOUR DATA USED BY DIOR?
FOR HOW LONG MAY WE KEEP IT?
WHO MAY ACCESS YOUR DATA?
HOW DO WE PROTECT IT AND KEEP IT CONFIDENTIAL?
HOW DO WE ADDRESS CROSS-BORDER PROTECTIONS?
WHAT ADDITIONAL RIGHTS ARE PROVIDED FOR RESIDENTS OF CERTAIN REGIONS?
HOW DOES DIOR PROTECT CHILDREN'S PRIVACY?
UPDATES TO THIS STATEMENT
CONTACT US
NOTICE ABOUT COOKIE MANAGEMENT
NOTICE ABOUT SOCIAL LOGIN
NOTICE ON THE PROCESSING OF DATA SHARED WITH THE LVMH GROUP
NOTICE ABOUT 30 MONTAIGNE ACTIVITIES
CHRISTIAN DIOR COUTURE - CANDIDATE PRIVACY STATEMENT
PARFUMS CHRISTIAN DIOR - CANDIDATE PRIVACY STATEMENT
CHRISTIAN DIOR PRIVACY POLICY (19)
PRIVACY STATEMENT - CHRISTIAN DIOR COUTURE
Last Updated: 05-2024
Confidentiality and security of your personal data are important to us. We would like to offer you personalized services while respecting your privacy and choices.
This Privacy Statement (“Statement”) is provided by The Maison Christian Dior Couture (“Maison,” “we” or “us”), a luxury retail and wholesale brand with its global headquarters in Paris, France.
The purpose of this Statement is to inform you in a transparent and simple manner about the processing of the personal data that you provide or that we collect through the different touchpoints you use to interact with us (e.g. in store, client services, dior.com, social media, digital apps, events), about possible transfers to third parties, as well as your rights and options to control your personal data and protect your privacy.
An easy to read and dedicated micro Privacy Statement is available via this
link
. It summarizes at high level the processing of your personal data By Christian Dior Couture.
WHO ARE WE?
The Maison Christian Dior Couture
Christian Dior Couture SA
(head office), a public limited company under French law with its head office located at 30 avenue Montaigne, 75008 Paris, France, and
all of the Christian Dior Couture affiliates with whom you share your information.
Christian Dior Couture
is a story of dreams and elegance, passion and excellence; it is also a story of know-how. The creations of Christian Dior Couture express the passion for beautiful gestures and exceptional objects. From haute couture to ready-to-wear, including leather goods, watchmaking and jewelry, know-how is transformed into the art of making.
Who we are?
What data may we collect or receive about you?
How do we collect or receive your data?
For what purposes are your data used by Dior?
For how long may we keep it?
Who may access your data?
How do we protect it and keep it confidential?
How do we address cross-border protections?
What additional protections are provided for residents of certain regions?
How does Dior protect children's privacy?
Contact Us
WHAT DATA MAY WE COLLECT OR RECEIVE ABOUT YOU?
"Personal data" means any information that could reasonably identify you either directly (e.g. your name) or indirectly (e.g. through a unique client ID number).
The personal data we collect depends upon the touchpoint of our interaction and is also limited to that which is relevant and appropriate for the interaction.  Unless you choose to interact with us via other touchpoints, such as (but not limited to) by making a purchase on our site, signing up for one of our programs or services, using our apps, communicating with us via email, phone or submitting online forms, or posting a comment or a like online, our data collection is limited to the use of ‘cookies’ for website visitors.
For customers and other individuals who sign up for programs or services or otherwise interact with us beyond browsing our site via the touchpoints described above, for example, we collect certain relevant information from you. The information we collect is related to the particular transaction as well as our overall relationship with you.  For example, if you make purchases from Dior.com or in our stores, we must collect information to process (and, if relevant, fulfill and ship) your order. We generally collect your contact details, contact preferences, and information that will allow us to make recommendations to you about our products or services that may be of interest.  We may centralize the information pertaining to our customers so that we have it organized in one place, as this helps us manage our relationship with you as well as your choices and preferences. Or, if you subscribe to our personalised newsletter, we collect your email address.
Should you wish to know more about the types of information we collect, please refer to the dedicated table provided via this
link
.
We invite you to keep us regularly informed in writing of any change in your contact details.
We Collect and Use Limited Sensitive Information.
As described above, we collect personal data that is described under some laws as sensitive personal data,” special categories of personal data, sensitive personal information, or similar terms (collectively referred to here as “Sensitive Personal Data”).  Here, we provide more information about which categories of the personal data described above may be designated as Sensitive Personal Data, and how we use these categories of Sensitive Personal Data.  We only use Sensitive Personal Data to provide you goods and services, and do not use such information to infer characteristics about you. Depending on what you choose to provide and how we interact with you, we may collect:
Account log-ins to provide Dior products and services. Account login information is used to identify an active user on any site that requires login. Login information includes first and last name and corresponding email for such account, as well as the associated account password.
Financial information to process your orders.  We collect and use credit or debit card information and required security or access codes in order to process payments and fulfill any order you make.
Passport-related information to process your orders.  We may collect passport or other government-issued ID information in connection with an order, including when you are purchasing a product in a country other than that in which you live, in order for you to make purchases free of value added tax (VAT).
HOW DO WE COLLECT OR RECEIVE YOUR DATA?
We may collect or receive data via the following touchpoints:
Use of Dior.com;
In-store, including in communication with our salesperson;
Dior events you attend;
Public Relations relationship and communication;
Contact with the Client Services;
Forms you complete (in store or online);
During your purchase journey, you will be able to choose between i) logging into your existing Dior account, ii) creating a new account, or iii) paying as a Guest;
Digital apps you use;
Digital experiences such as virtual beauty technology in store (if you choose to use that technology where offered via a retailer), or our third-party vendors may receive data via virtual try-on online;
Dior social media pages you visit or interact with, or other social media pages on which you post Dior content or comments;
Digital media advertising you click on;
Search engines’ paid advertising you click on;
Retailers (such as Department Stores) in which you have purchased a Dior product and in which you consented (e.g. via an iPad) to have your details shared with our Maison to receive its communications; or
Surveys or satisfaction questionnaires you answer.
FOR WHAT PURPOSES ARE YOUR DATA USED BY DIOR?
Depending on the context in which your data is collected, we use your data for:
the provision of Dior products and services, including the management of your orders, the management of personalized content, communications and interactions with Dior (digital or otherwise), and providing customer support;
the facilitation of showing you what your selected product would look like on you (in relation to using our try-on technology, though when online, all processing for providing the feature is done by our third-party vendors’ proprietary technology), and for certain in-store virtual try-ons, offering you the option of receiving your photo via email;
the management of your account and profile (for example, in order to simplify your navigation through our different country-specific websites, if you navigate to another country your customer account will automatically be duplicated in that market. This means that it will not be necessary to create a new customer account);
analyse the performance of our Maison on social networks in order to produce statistical analyses (studies of results by country, influence of the Maison and analysis of the campaigns implemented).
analyse your preferences and habits, anticipate your needs from your consumer profile and your publications/mentions on social networks.
personalised customer experience: we may provide you with personalised communications by means of email, postal mail, SMS or calls based on the communication preferences you have indicated and your consumer profile (where permitted) (if you have an account, please connect to either your Parfums Christian Dior account or your Christian Dior Couture account to modify your channel preferences.  Otherwise you can contact our customer service (see "Contact Us" section below)). With your free, specific, informed and unambiguous consent (where required), we use your personal data to send you personalised communications based on your interests (newsletters, offers, invitations and surveys).
In the latter two interactions (“analysing your preferences and habits” & “providing you with a personalised customer experience”), when we send personalised communications or content, we may use so-called profiling techniques. For the sake of transparency within this Statement, profiling is currently defined as any kind of automated processing of personal data which consists of using that personal data to evaluate certain personal aspects relating to a natural person, in particular to analyse or predict elements relating to the preferences, interests, behaviour or location of that natural person. In these circumstances, you have the right to opt-out, meaning the right to withdraw your consent by unsubscribing or see the “Contact Us” section below.
Should you wish to know more about the categories of processing activities for which we collect and use your information alongside indicative Legal basis for which we base such processing, please refer to the dedicated table provided via this
link
FOR HOW LONG MAY WE KEEP IT?
Please note that each Maison has its own retention periods that include the requirements regarding the products each Maison offers.
Unless otherwise stated, we only keep your personal data for as long as we need it to fulfill the purpose of collection, to meet your needs, or to comply with our legal or business obligations, and to fulfill the purposes described above in this Privacy Statement. By way of example, we keep your data for up to 10 years from the date of your last purchase if you are a client and up to 3 years if you are a prospect from the date of your last interaction with us.
When you choose to use our virtual try-on technology:
in store (where offered via a retailer) the photos or images connected with that use are stored for a maximum period of 7 days, and then irreversibly erased;
Online, the photos, images, and information processed to apply the selected beauty or try-on feature is never possessed by Dior (rather it is only possessed by our third-party vendor) and is not retained or stored.
When we no longer need to use your personal data, it is removed from our systems and records or anonymized so that you can no longer be identified from it.
We use the following criteria to determine how long to retain personal data:
Our relationship with you, and the products and services we provide to you;
Your requests to us regarding your information, or our products or services;
Any legal obligations to retain the data, or for our own legal purposes (such as enforcing our agreements or litigation);
Recommendations and legal requirements, including applicable international, national, federal and state statutes; and
Technical considerations and feasibility, and level of protections in place for your personal data.
WHO MAY ACCESS YOUR DATA?
We communicate your information, including if possible in a form that does not allow a direct identification, to:
Other Dior entities as well as department stores where you buy our products in order to provide you with identical personalized service worldwide
Our trusted third-party providers, including other entities of the LVMH group, acting as subcontractors according to our instructions and on our behalf only
For example, we entrust certain services to third parties responsible for delivering a product to you, payment service providers and transaction security against fraud, third parties who assist us in the organization of our events, third parties providing services IT, digital communication and public relations agencies, third parties who assist us in customer care, third parties who assist us in qualitative surveys of our products, programs or services.
Third parties including the LVMH group wishing to know your preferences and consumption trends for our programs and services in order to improve visibility, accessibility and performance
Our trusted third-party partners assist us in the management of your orders. In particular, we entrust certain services to third parties responsible for delivering a product to you, to payment service providers and to providers ensuring the security of anti-fraud transactions.
Third-party partners, who provide advertising, marketing, website performance, analytics, and similar services for Dior, including cookies or other trackers, including for the purposes of behavior-based targeted advertising.
Please note that these third-party partners may act as data controllers; in such cases, they have their own privacy policies. These third parties include:
Third parties in the event of a change of control, for legal reasons, or with your prior consent
Third parties wishing to know your main interests to constitute similar audiences and target prospects that match your profile. In the context of this specific data processing, Dior is not the Data Controller relating to prospecting and you will not be subject to prospecting, your data is only used to constitute profiles similar to yours
We may also offer you the possibility of using your social media connection data. Please note that in this case, you are sharing your profile information with us. The personal data shared depends on the configuration of the social network platform. Please note that these social networks apply their own privacy policy.
We illustrate some examples below:
- Facebook (Privacy policy accessible
here
)
- Google (Privacy policy
here
)
- Instagram (Privacy policy accessible
here
)
Third parties conducting statistics on our performance on social networks on our behalf
Third parties such as IAS (International Accreditation Service), which assists us, for example, in finding out the exposure rate of our created formats. For more information, their privacy policy is available
here
.
Should you wish to know more about Third Parties our Maison may use to process your personal information, please refer to the dedicated and illustrative table provided via this
link
.
HOW DO WE PROTECT IT AND KEEP IT CONFIDENTIAL?
We have adopted reasonable and appropriate physical, technical and organizational security safeguards to protect your data from loss, misuse, alteration, destruction or access by unauthorized third parties. The Internet, wireless networks and information storage are not 100% secure. We cannot guarantee the security of your personal data stored or sent to us. We encourage you to take precautions to protect your personal data. For example, in creating your account on dior.com, entering a personal password complying with our security requirements is compulsory and part of this Privacy Statement.
The security safeguards that we have adopted are commensurate with the sensitivity of the particular data collected.  For example, credit, debit and other payment information is subject to stricter security measures.
Regarding your purchases, your bank details are encrypted through Dior servers. Payments are made via a secure payment platform which is PCI-DSS certified, supplemented by control measures, to ensure the security of purchases made and to fight against fraud.
We also require our partners and group companies to uphold a substantially similar level of protection for your data. The measures are evaluated and updated to address new threats and challenges, as well as new legal requirements in the countries where we operate.
To the maximum extent allowed by applicable law, you agree and acknowledge that Dior will not be liable or responsible for use or disclosure of your information that is the result of unauthorized or illegal access to our systems or those of our vendors, agents, contractors, affiliates, or partners. If you have reason to believe that the security of your communications or personal data has been compromised, please notify us immediately using the contact information below.
HOW DO WE ADDRESS CROSS-BORDER PROTECTIONS?
Because Dior operates in many countries across the world, some of your data may be collected, accessible or stored outside of your country of residence.  You should know that the data protection and security requirements differ from place to place and may not offer the same level of protection as those in your home country.  Nevertheless, Dior and our group companies have taken steps to ensure an adequate level of protection of your data irrespective of where it is located, such as by using data transfer methods approved by the European Commission (where the data protection laws are considered to be the strongest worldwide).  We also require our third-party partners to fulfill applicable data transfer obligations in relation to the personal data that they receive on our behalf.
In this context:
- Christian Dior Couture and all of its affiliates have entered into a Personal Data Processing and Transfer Agreement
- In specific cases and roles, Christian Dior Couture and other Maisons legally independent from Christian Dior Couture, such as Parfums Christian Dior, have entered into a Data Processing and Transfer Agreement
WHAT ADDITIONAL RIGHTS ARE PROVIDED FOR RESIDENTS OF CERTAIN REGIONS?
Dior has adopted the data protection and security practices described in this Statement for all individuals within scope.  In addition, we also recognize and have addressed data protection and security measures that are required on a local or regional level.  This includes, for example, those required for residents of the European Union/European Economic Area under the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) 2016/679.
In particular, the GDPR provides the following rights (with some exceptions):
The right to be informed: you have the right to obtain clear, transparent and easily understandable information about how we use your personal data, and your rights. You will find all this information in this Statement;
The right of access: you have the right to access to the personal data Dior holds about you;
The right to restriction; you have the right to suspend the use of your personal data in certain cases;
The right of rectification: you have the right to have your personal data rectified if it is incorrect or outdated and / or completed if it is incomplete;
The right to erasure / right to be forgotten: you have the right to have your personal data erased or deleted. Please note this is not an absolute right, as we may have legal or legitimate grounds for retaining your personal data;
The right to object to direct marketing: you can unsubscribe or opt out of our direct marketing communication at any time. You are able to do so by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link in any email or communication we send you. You are also able to request to receive non-personalized communications about our products and services;
The right to withdraw consent at any time for data processing based on consent: You can withdraw your consent to our processing of your data when such processing is based on consent; and
The right to data portability: you have the right to move, copy or transfer data from our database to another. This only applies to data that you have provided, where processing is based on a contract or your consent, and the processing is carried out by automated means.
You are also entitled to determine your personal data protection guidelines and directives in the event of death or extern circumstances.
You also have the right to contact the data protection authority of your country in order to lodge a complaint against the data protection and privacy practices of Dior.
We also wish to inform you about the contacts of other authorities in Europe that you can find and contact on the website of the European Data Protection Board:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_fr
.
We may require proof of your identity and full details of your request before we process it.
HOW DOES DIOR PROTECT CHILDREN'S PRIVACY?
Dior has adopted practices that are designed to ensure that we do not intentionally or knowingly collect or maintain any information from children under the age of 16, though we do not monitor the age of users of our services. If we learn that we mistakenly collected any information from anyone under the age of 16, we will purge it immediately, except for responding to a question or inquiry on a one-time basis from his/her parent or legal guardian. If you are under the age of 16, you should not submit personal data on this website or any other website without the consent of your parent or guardian. If a parent or guardian of a child under 16 believes that the child has provided us with personal data, the parent or guardian of that child should contact us, see “Contact Us” section below.
We do not knowingly sell or share the information of children of any age.
UPDATES TO THIS STATEMENT
Dior reserves the right to change this Statement at any time at its sole discretion and will post the date it was last updated at the top of this Statement. Such changes shall be effective immediately upon posting them to Dior’s website, or otherwise providing them to you. We will provide additional notice to you if we make any changes that materially affect your privacy rights.
CONTACT US
If you have any general questions or concerns about how we process and use your personal data or would like to exercise any of your privacy rights, you may contact us at the following details:
By email to:
privacy@christiandior.com
By phone to Dior Customer Service Centre relevant number of your location as provided here:
CONTACT | DIOR
NOTICE ABOUT COOKIE MANAGEMENT
This Notice about cookies applies when visiting the website available at Dior.com (hereinafter the “Website(s)”), which belongs to Christian Dior Couture and Parfums Christian Dior (hereinafter “Dior”).
The purpose of this cookie policy is to inform you of the source and use of browsing information collected during your visit to the Website and the tools provided to allow you to express your choices about cookies.
WHAT IS A COOKIE?
Subject to your choices, when visiting the Website, a text file may be placed on your device (computer, smartphone, tablet), courtesy of your web browser.
This text file is a cookie. During its validity or registration period, it will allow the sender to identify your device on future visits.
Some cookies are essential for using the Website, others optimize and personalize the contents displayed.
WHO SENDS THE COOKIES ON OUR WEBSITE?
Cookies that may be saved to your device when you visit the Website pages are issued by Dior and/or third parties. Only the cookie issuer is likely to read or modify the information contained within it.
Cookies sent by Dior are mainly related to the operation of the Website.
The others are third party cookies sent by our partners or advertising agencies, via the advertisements shown on our Website. The examples below are for illustration purposes:
Personal_id (twitter.com)
Role: When Twitter acts as a third-party host, it collects data via a range of plug-ins and integrations, which are primarily used for targeting and tracking.
Link to privacy policy:
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Identity_fbp (doubleclick.net)
Role: Doubleclick is Google’s real-time auction ad exchange
Link to privacy policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en#infocollect
Identity_xttrk2_ids (cstatic.weborama.fr)
Role: Weborama is an online advertising company based in France.
Link to privacy policy:
https://weborama.com/en/weborama-privacy-commitment/
Dior makes every effort to ensure that third-party cookies are issued and used in compliance with the applicable regulations.
WHAT IS THE PURPOSE OF THE COOKIES ISSUED VIA THE WEBSITE?
Subject to your choices, various cookies may be installed on your device for the purposes detailed below. For the sake of transparency and in as much depth as possible, we inform you of the purposes of the third-party cookies that we are aware of, and the ways in which you can make choices about these cookies. All cookies may be cross-referenced with your customer data in order to personalize your experience, limit commercial interaction, ensure the proper functioning of your loyalty benefits, improve our services and guarantee your satisfaction.
Essential cookies for Website operations
“Essential” cookies are necessary for Website browsing and allow you to use the Website’s main features.
For example, these cookies are intended particularly for:
-         saving your choices or desire not to make a choice about tracker cookies;
-         service authentication;
-         saving the contents of a shopping cart;
-         customizing the interface.
Removing them may make it hard to browse the Website or may make it impossible to place an order. These cookies may be installed on your device by Dior or its service providers.
These cookies enable or facilitate digital communications and/or may be strictly necessary for the provision of an online communication service at your express request. As a result, they do not require your prior consent. Saving or reading such cookies is necessary for provision of the service and will be based on Dior’s legitimate interest in implementing such processing for the proper use of its Website.
Personalization cookies
Personalization cookies allow us to personalize and improve your user experience, for example by making your searches easier and optimizing your shopping experience. They also allow us to adapt the look of the Website to your device display during your visits.
These Cookies are issued by Dior and/or by our service providers. The issue and use of cookies by third parties on our Website may also be subject to the privacy protection policies of these third parties.
Such cookies are saved or read, subject to your prior consent. If you refuse these cookies, you will not be able to benefit from the functionalities described in this paragraph.
Analytical cookies
Analytical cookies make it possible to gauge the audience for various Website content, to establish visitor statistics and volumes in order to evaluate and improve our service ergonomics. These cookies include those used to create similar profiles that will be prospected according to your information.
These Cookies are issued by Dior and/or by our service providers. The issue and use of cookies by third parties on our Website may also be subject to the privacy protection policies of these third parties.
The information communicated to technical service providers is transmitted in the form of aggregate statistics and traffic volumes, excluding any personal information. These statistics are reconciled with the traffic statistics of other websites, as well as with your customer data.
Such cookies are saved or read, subject to your prior consent. Refusing the implementation of or deleting such cookies does not affect your Website browsing but is likely to prevent us from ensuring the best quality of service we wish to offer our visitors.
Sharing cookies (social links)
Our Website may include third-party computer applications that allow you to share Website content with others, or to publish your visit or opinion of Website content to these other persons. This is notably the case for “Share” and “Like” buttons on social networks such as Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Pinterest, etc.
The social network providing such application buttons is likely to identify you through this button, if you use the button, and even if you have not used this button but are signed in to the social network when you consult the Website (open session during your browsing). Share buttons will allow you to connect the contents consulted to your user account.
We have no control over the process social networks use to collect information about your Website browsing and associated with the personal data at their disposal. We invite you to consult the privacy protection policies of these social networks.
Advertising cookies
Advertising cookies are not essential for browsing but allow you to see more relevant advertisements personalized to your interests on the Website as well as other websites you may browse. As such, advertising cookies allow, for example, the display of advertising, capping the display (not presenting the same advertising to a user in a repetitive manner), combatting click fraud, billing the display service, the measurement of targets more interested in the advertising to better understand the audience, etc.
Advertising content personalization can also be achieved by using our partner’s technology, to associate your device’s Website browsing information with the data you provided us when you registered.
Saving or reading such cookies is subject to your prior consent. Refusing these advertising cookies has no impact on your use of the Website, nor will it stop advertising on the Website. However, we will be unable to offer you advertising that takes your interests into account.
How long are the cookies kept?
Cookies saved on your device have a maximum lifespan of thirteen (13) months. At the end of this period, personal data collected through the cookies will be deleted.
HOW TO MANAGE COOKIES SAVED ON YOUR DEVICE
Cookies saved on your device result from the settings you have chosen during your visit, which can be modified at any time under the conditions detailed in this cookie policy.
There are various ways to manage the implementation of cookies, as presented below.
If your device is used by more than one person and operates more than one browser, we cannot be certain that the services and advertisements sent to your device are appropriate for your personal use of your device, rather than of another user of your device. If you choose to share your device and browser cookie settings with others, you are responsible for doing so at your own discretion.
You can express your choices using:
The cookie manager
You can decide whether cookies are saved on your device using the cookie settings tool by
clicking here
, in the cookie banner or in the Website footer.
Cookies are managed for cookie purposes.
Your browser settings
You can also configure your browser to accept and save cookies on your device or to reject them.
Each browser has different settings. These are usually described in your browser help menu. We therefore recommend reading it. This will show you how to change your cookie preferences.
For Internet Explorer:
https://support.microsoft.com/en-gb/help/17442/windows-internet-explorer-delete-manage-cookies
For Safari:
https://support.apple.com/en-euro/guide/safari/sfri11471/mac
For Chrome:
https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en&hlrm=en
For Firefox:
https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/cookies-information-websites-store-on-your-computer
For Opera:
https://help.opera.com/en/latest/web-preferences/#cookies
Please note: any choices in your browser settings concerning the acceptance or refusal of cookies will be likely to modify your Internet browsing experience and your access to the Website and certain services requiring the use of these same cookies.
On the Youronlinechoices website
You can connect to the Youronlinechoices website (
https://www.youronlinechoices.com/uk/your-ad-choices
) built by digital advertising professionals. This website allows you to refuse or accept cookies that may be used to personalize the advertisements shown to you while you browse. This European platform is shared by hundreds of Internet advertising professionals. However, this will not prevent advertisements from being displayed on the websites you visit. It will only block technologies that allow advertising to be tailored to your interests.
NOTICE ABOUT SOCIAL LOGIN
Privacy Notice – Register using social providers
For what activities personal data are processed
By creating a Dior account, logging on Dior.com via Google, Facebook, Line, Kakao or by binding your Dior account to your Google, Facebook, Line, Kakao accounts, in this case, you are sharing your profile information with us. The personal data shared depends on the configuration of the social network platform.
In order to facilitate the account creation process, we can pre-fill the account creation form with information retrieved from the social provider account.
What data are exactly involved :
The types of information that Dior can collect depends on the settings selected for that provider and is subjected to the processing details under their own established privacy policies. Here are the types of information per
Google :
first name and last name, e-mail, language preferences (not used), profile picture (not used)
Facebook
: first name and last name, e-mail, profile picture (not used)
Kakao login :
fullname (not used), e-mail, phone number
Line
:
first name and last name, e-mail, phone number, profile picture (not used)
3. Who is the Data controller
: is Christian Dior Couture SA (registered office), a public limited company under French law whose registered office is located at 30 avenue Montaigne, Paris 8, France, and all the affiliates of Christian Dior Couture with whom you share your information.
Please note that as displayed in the section “Who may access your data” referred to in our global Privacy Statement   your social media connection data is administered and managed by the above listed social media platforms acting on your social media account and may act as Data Controller. Please note that these social networks apply their own privacy policy, settings and standards.
4. Where can I find further information?
Please contact us as below if you wish to exercise your rights under applicable Data Protection Laws or if you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your personal data.
- By email at
privacy@christiandior.com
- By postal mail: Christian Dior Couture, 30 avenue Montaigne, 75008 Paris, France
More details can be found in our global Privacy Statement at
https://www.dior.com/en_gb/fashion/personal-data
NOTICE ON THE PROCESSING OF DATA SHARED WITH THE LVMH GROUP
What is the context of the processing?
Christian Dior Couture belongs to the LVMH Group, which comprises many exceptional Maisons that offer high quality products and services in all sectors including  Fashion & Leather Goods, Perfumes & Cosmetics, Watches & Jewelry, Wines & Spirits, Selective Retailing and Hospitality, Culture & leisure. The list of all LVMH Maisons is available at https://www.lvmh.com. If you are customer of our Maison, you may also be a customer of other LVMH Maisons.
What is the purpose of the processing?
We endeavor to improve your experience across the LVMH Maisons you sent to by proposing personalized offers and services and customized marketing communications that correspond to your interests across LVMH Maisons. This relies on knowing your preferences and interests. We will be able to enrich your Dior profile with this information.
How is the processing conducted?
If you consent we will share the purchases you have made with us during the last 3 years with LVMH, our parent company, in a pseudonymous way (which means that your name and your contact details will not be sent to LVMH). Your purchases will be analyzed and matched with purchases made from other Maisons of the LVMH Group where you have given a similar consent. Each Maison that has your consent will receive back from LVMH generalized information concerning your purchasing habits and preferences with other Maisons, and Dior may reach out to you to offer Dior products based on this information. Should you wish further information on how we process or share your personal data, please visit the dedicated sections of the general Dior Privacy Statement: “FOR WHAT PURPOSES is your data used by Dior?” and “WHO can access your data?”
Who is the Data Controller?
Christian Dior Couture will remain the sole data controller which means that it is the company that is responsible for the information that you provide to it. LVMH acts as our data processor, or service provider, and will not use your data for any purpose other than the one described above. For example, LVMH will not use your data for its own purposes, will not contact you for marketing purposes based on the data we provide, and will not share information about you with Maisons of the LVMH Group to which you are not a customer and/or to whom you have not given consent.
NOTICE ABOUT 30 MONTAIGNE ACTIVITIES
PRIVACY STATEMENT - CHRISTIAN DIOR –  30 Montaigne Hotel, Restaurant and Gallery
The Maison Christian Dior Couture attaches particular importance to the processing, confidentiality and security of your personal data. We are committed to offering you personalized services while respecting your privacy and personal choices.
The purpose of this privacy policy is to inform you in a clear, simple and complete manner of the processing carried out on the personal data that you provide to us, or that each of our Affiliates can collect from the various outlets, contact you may have with us (e.g. shop, Customer Service, dior.com, social networks, digital applications, events), their possible transfer to third parties as well as your rights and the options you have to control your information protect your privacy, in accordance with current regulations.
In particular,
this Privacy Statement is dedicated to the collection, handling and usage of your personal data during your various interaction with the a) Hotel, b) the Restaurant or c) the Gallery
located at 30 Montaigne (also named herewith as “
30 Montaigne
”). Throughout this dedicated Privacy Statement, in relation to other processing activities, notably with regards to your purchases of Dior products, please refer to the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link
.
The Data Controller will be Maison Christian Dior Couture, within the meaning of the regulations applicable to personal data and in particular with regard to article 24 of the Regulations (EU) 2016/679 (hereinafter "GDPR").
In this Statement dedicated to the activities of the “30 Montaigne” and your interaction with it, you will find information about:
• Who are we?
• What data we may collect about you
• How we collect or receive your data
• For what purposes we use your data
• How long we keep them
• Who are the recipients of your data
• How we protect them and ensure their confidentiality
• How we treat your preferences and your rights stemming from European Regulation
• The additional protections we offer to residents of certain regions
• How to contact us if you have questions about our use of your personal data
•Modification of this privacy statement
WHO are we ?
The Maison Christian Dior Couture
Christian Dior Couture SA
(head office), a public limited company under French law with its head office located at 30 avenue Montaigne, Paris 8, France, registered in the Paris Trade and Companies Register under number 612 035 832 and represented by Hien Tran Trung in his capacity as Administrative and Financial Director of Christian Dior Couture,
And all of the Christian Dior Couture affiliates with whom you share your information
Christian Dior Couture is a story of dreams and elegance, passion and excellence; it is also a story of know-how. The creations of Christian Dior Couture express the passion for beautiful gestures and exceptional objects. From haute couture to ready-to-wear, including leather goods, watchmaking and jewelry, know-how is transformed into the art of making.
WHAT data do we collect about you?
"Personal data" means any information that identifies you either directly (such as your name) or indirectly (for example, using a unique customer number).
The personal data we collect depends on the point of contact through which you interact with us, as well as the purposes of this interaction as described in this Policy and are also limited to those which are relevant and appropriate for this interaction. Visitors to the Dior.com website, or applicable websites for the “30 Montaigne”, who view our products, services information and offers can choose to do so without logging in, and the same is true for point-of-sale search and browsing on social media. Unless you choose to interact with us through these contact points, for example:
• by making a purchase on our dedicated sites,
• by subscribing to one of our programs or services,
• by writing to us via the consumer contact forms,
• or by writing us a comment in the free online order fields,
or else, our data collection is limited to the use of "cookies" (visitors) for website visitors whose conditions are specifically defined by our cookie policy and according to your preferences. For the sake of transparency and clarity, our cookie management policy is separate from this general policy. The cookie management policy is accessible from this link.
Depending on the data that you communicate to us or that you share with us, personal data may include information concerning:
• Your identity and contact details: surname, first name, postal address, email address, telephone number, and for the “30 Montaigne” Hotel only: Passport details
• Your interests
• A history of your purchases (in store or online, including your orders, tracking and invoices, amount and type of purchase)
• Your requests via our customer service or our public relations service
• The Dior events in which you participate
• Your food intolerance in relation to the “30 Montaigne” Restaurant
• Your satisfaction and comments on our programs, services and products
Regarding your purchases, payments are made via a secure payment platform, supplemented by control measures, including encryption of contact details, in order to guarantee the security of purchases made and to fight against fraud. Your bank details are therefore not accessible on Dior's servers.
We invite you to ensure that your data is regularly updated, either by modifying it directly on our sites or, by informing us in writing of any modification by referring to the dedicated section "How to contact us".
HOW do we collect or receive your data?
As part of our relationships, the data we collect may be collected through the following contact points:
• Course on dedicated websites such as galeriedior.com and billetterie.galeriedior.com
• Exchanges with our advisers at the “30 Montaigne”
• Dior events in which you participate
• Relationship with our public relations services
• Contact with Customer Service
• Forms that you fill out (at the “30 Montaigne” or online)
• Digital applications with which you interact
• Third party data providers with whom you share information
• Retailers for whom you agree to receive our communications
• Satisfaction surveys or questionnaires to which you answer
We make sure to identify the personal data essential for the purpose for which it is collected by indicating it with an asterisk like this ‘(*)’ on each personal data collection form. If you do not fill in these mandatory fields, we will not be able to respond to your requests and / or provide you with the services requested. The other information is optional and allows us to know you better and improve our communications and services to you. Although not mandatory, we recommend that you fill them in to allow you to benefit from the best possible experience during our interactions with you.
Further information on how Dior collects your data can be found at the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link.
FOR WHAT PURPOSES is your data used by Dior?
We are required to use your data for purposes defined according to the nature of our relationships. Thus, depending on the context in which your data is collected, it may be used for one or more of the following purposes:
• Managing your orders in relation to Grand Montaigne goods or services
• Management of personalized content and Dior communications (digital or not)
• Managing your profile
• Managing your requests in connection with Dior
• The management of events in which you register / participate in relation for instance of the Grand Montaigne Gallery
• The management of our website and our digital applications in relation to Grand Montaigne goods or services
• Management and improvement of our products and services, image and reputation
• Transaction management (securing online payments, prevention of fraud, incidents related to payments and debts)
• Analysis and personalization purposes: with your explicit consent (when required), we use your personal data to send you personalized communications (newsletters, offers, invitations and surveys) and analyze your preferences and habits, anticipate your needs from of your consumer profile. We can make you benefit from our personalized communications by means of emails, postal letters, SMS or calls according to the communication preferences that you have indicated to us and your consumer profile (when authorized).
Further information on Dior processing activities can be found at the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link.
We ensure the legal basis for the processing of your data according to the purpose (s) concerned, which may be, depending on the context in which it is collected:
• Your explicit consent: for example, for the purposes of managing our personalized commercial offers, managing your browsing via cookies under the conditions defined by our Cookies Policy, or establishing your consumer profile in applicable cases;
• The implementation of a contract, for example for your access to your customer account, the processing and follow-up of your orders;
• A legal obligation when processing is required by law, for example, keeping purchase invoices to prevent fraud;
• Our legitimate interest: for example, to improve our products and services, defend ourselves or secure our tools
HOW LONG can we keep them?
We keep your personal data only for the time necessary for the purpose pursued. In general, your personal data is stored in a dedicated “30 Montaigne” database:
For the guests staying at the “30 Montaigne” Hotel: 5 years starting at the date of the check in.
For the customers of “30 Montaigne” Restaurant: 3 years starting at the date of the meal payment
For the visitors of the “30 Montaigne” Gallery: 3 years starting at the date of the Gallery visiting ticket issuance.
When we no longer need to use your personal data, it is deleted from our systems and our registers or made anonymous so that it can no longer be identified, subject to retention for archival purposes. claims and litigation management as well as to meet our legal and / or regulatory obligations and / or to respond to requests from authorities authorized to make the request
WHO can access your data?
Your data is intended for the services of Maison Christian Dior concerned by your requests. We ensure that only duly authorized persons can access your personal data when this is necessary for the aforementioned purposes.
We do not pass your data on to third parties for commercial purposes.
At high level, we are only required to communicate your information if necessary, and if possible in a form that does not allow direct identification to:
• Other Dior entities as well as department stores where you buy our products in order to provide you with identical personalized service worldwide
• Our trusted third-party providers, including other entities of the LVMH group, acting as subcontractors according to our instructions and on our behalf only.
For example, we entrust certain services to third parties responsible for delivering a product to you, payment service providers and transaction security against fraud, third parties who assist us in the organization of our events, third parties providing services IT, digital communication and public relations agencies, third parties who assist us in customer service, third parties who assist us in qualitative surveys of our products, programs or services.
• Third parties including the LVMH group wishing to know your preferences and consumption trends for our programs and services in order to improve visibility, accessibility and performance.
• Our trusted third party partners assist us in the management of your orders. In particular, we entrust certain services to third parties responsible for delivering a product to you, to payment service providers and to providers ensuring the security of anti-fraud transactions. Please note that these partners may act as data controllers; in this case, they have their own privacy policies.
Further information on how Dior shares your data can be found at the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link.
HOW do we protect and ensure the confidentiality of your data?
We take all the necessary precautions to guarantee the confidentiality and security of your data and to prevent it from being distorted, damaged, destroyed or from unauthorized third parties having access to it.
We ask our partners and group companies to maintain a level of protection similar to ours concerning your personal data. The security measures put in place are evaluated and updated to face new threats and new challenges, as well as new legal requirements in the countries where we operate.
HOW do we deal with cross-border protections?
Given the presence of Dior in many countries around the world and in order to provide you with personalized service worldwide, some of your data may be collected, accessible or stored outside your country of residence. You should be aware that data protection and security requirements differ from place to place and may not offer the same level of protection as those of your country of origin. However, Dior and our group companies have taken measures to guarantee an adequate level of protection of your data, regardless of their location.
Further information on how Dior processing handle data transfer can be found at the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link.
WHAT additional protections are provided for residents of certain regions?
Dior has adopted the data protection and security practices described in this privacy policy for all individuals concerned. In addition, we have also identified and taken into account the data protection and security measures required at local or regional level. This includes, for example, those required for residents of the European Union / European Economic Area under the General EU Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) 2016/679.
In particular, the GDPR provides the following rights:
• Right to information: you have the right to obtain clear, transparent and understandable information about how we use your personal data and about your rights. You will find all of this information in this policy
• Right of access: you have the right to access the personal data that Dior holds about you
• Right of rectification: you have the right to have your personal data rectified if it is inaccurate or obsolete and / or to supplement it if it is incomplete
• Right to erasure / right to be forgotten: you have the right to have your data erased or deleted. However, this right may be limited by a legal reason or our legitimate interest in keeping your personal data
• Right of opposition: you can at any time request to no longer receive our communications relating to our offers, news and events. You can in particular use the hypertext link provided for this purpose in each email or communication that we send to you. You can also request to receive non-personalized communications about our products and services
• Right to withdraw consent at any time for data processing based on consent: you can withdraw your consent relating to our processing of your data when this processing is based on consent
• Right to data portability: you have the right to move, copy or transfer data from our database to another. This right only applies to the data you have provided, and provided that the processing is based on a contract or your consent and carried out using automated processes
You, or one of your legally designated representatives, also have the right to formulate specific or general directives concerning the conservation, erasure and communication of your post-mortem data and this in application of the Law for a Digital Republic.
HOW to contact us ?
1 / Please contact us in the manner below if you wish to exercise these rights or if you have questions or complaints regarding the processing of your personal data.
Christian Dior Couture
-             By email at privacy@christiandior.com
-             By postal mail: Christian Dior Couture, 30 avenue Montaigne, 75008 Paris, France
2 / You also have the right to contact the Dior lead data protection authority, the CNIL, at any time, in
order to lodge a complaint against Dior's data protection and privacy practices. The CNIL can be contacted using the following information:
Commission Nationale de l’Informatique et les Libertés (CNIL)
3 Place de Fontenoy
TSA 80715 - 75334 Paris, Cedex 07
Phone. +33 1 53 73 22 22
Fax +33 1 53 73 22 00
Website: http://www.cnil.fr/
CHRISTIAN DIOR COUTURE - CANDIDATE PRIVACY STATEMENT
Statement relating to the protection of your personal data collected in the context of recruitment
This Privacy Statement for Candidates (hereinafter the “
Privacy Statement
”) is intended to provide visitors and users (“
You
”) of the www.dior.com website, as well as of all the Dior’s websites with .com, .it, .ru, .co, .jp, .cn domain names suffixes (hereinafter collectively the “
Website
”) with information relating to how the Maison Christian Dior Couture (hereinafter “
Christian Dior Couture
” or “
We/Us
”) processes your personal data (hereinafter the “
Personal Data
” or “
Data
”) and about your rights in this respect.
Christian Dior Couture places the highest priority and takes the utmost care to protect your Personal Data.
1. Who are we? Who is the Data Controller of your Personal data?
During your recruitment experience, and in order to inform you in advance, the Data Controller will be Christian Dior Couture within the meaning of the regulations applicable to personal data and in particular with regard to article 24 of the Regulations (EU) 2016/679 (hereinafter "GDPR").
As an example, referring to some of the Maison iconic products:
• Lady Dior bag
• 30 Montaigne bag
• Bar jacket
Christian Dior Couture SA
(head office), a public limited company under French law with its head office located at 30 avenue Montaigne, Paris 8, France, registered with the Paris Trade and Companies Register under number 612 035 832 and represented by Hien Tran Trung in his capacity as Administrative and Financial Director of Christian Dior Couture,
And all Christian Dior Couture affiliates
Christian Dior Couture is a story of dreams and elegance, passion and excellence; it is also a story of know-how. The creations of Christian Dior Couture express the passion for beautiful gestures and exceptional objects. From haute couture to ready-to-wear, including leather goods, watchmaking and jewelry, know-how is transformed into the art of making.
2. What is a “personal data”?
Personal Data refers to any information or pieces of information that could identify You either directly (
e.g.
your name, surname, email, home address, etc.) or indirectly (
e.g.
through pseudonymized data, such as a unique ID number, etc.). It may also include unique identifiers like your computer’s IP address.
3. Why and how do We use the Personal Data that We collect?
3.1 How do We collect your Personal Data?
We collect your Personal Data as follows:
directly from You
when You use our Website and our services (completion of various forms on the Website, direct communication with Us through our institutional departments, etc.);
automatically
when You access or use the Website (technical details, IP address, browsing information, etc.).
3.2 What Data do We collect?
We collect several types of Personal Data about You:
Personal Data that We collect directly from You
We collect Personal Data that You provide directly when You use our Website.
This is specifically the case when You:
interact with Us through the contact forms,
register to receive our newsletters or institutional documentation,
apply to job offers.
The categories of Personal Data that We collect include:
Identification and contact information:
e.g., last name, first name, mailing address, contact details needed to identify You when You interact with Us,
Application information:
e.g., last name, first name, email address, telephone number, professional experience and all the information You provide by sending your application and/or your curriculum vitae: photo, skills, education level, spoken languages, salary expectations, home address, hobbies, family status, etc.  We only collect and store this Data in connection with the management of our own job offers and do not use them for any other purposes, including for commercial purposes.
Personal Data that We collect automatically
We automatically collect certain Data about You when You access or use the Website, specifically:
Technical information
: We collect information about the device that You use to login, as well as your use of the Website (
g
., operating system, type of browser used, whether a proxy is used, location of the device inferred from your IP address that identifies your computer, access time, accessed pages and the link that enabled You to access our Website),
Browsing information: We use tracking technologies to collect Data about You when You use our Website.
3.3 On what legal grounds and for which purposes do We use the Data that We collect?
In accordance with current personal data protection regulations, We only collect Personal Data when We have a legal basis to do so.
Personal Data is collected either:
i.          based on pre-contractual measures
ii.          based on your consent,
iii.          in our legitimate interest, or
iv.          to meet our legal obligations.
(i) We collect your Personal Data on the basis of
pre-contractual measures
, in particular in the context of the processing of applications (CV and motivation letter) and management of interviews.
(ii) We collect Personal Data
based on your consent
, for the following purposes
:
Share opportunities
that can match your profile and keep you up to date on the life of Maison Dior,
(iii) We collect Personal Data
based on our legitimate interest
, for the following purposes:
·        to manage your requests and queries: We use your Data to send You the information You request,
to defend our interests
in the event of a dispute or court action
,
to manage cybersecurity
of the Website
,
to prevent fraudulent acts
in order to ensure the security of our assets and contents.
(iv) We may also store your Personal Data when
the law requires Us to do so or to defend our legal rights
.
3.4 Who has access to your Data?
3.4.1
Accessibility within Christian Dior Couture
Your Data is processed by the Christian Dior Couture for the purposes described above and are only accessible to Christian Dior Couture personnel who need to know it to perform their duties.
In this respect, your Personal Data is processed by the following departments of Christian Dior Couture and/or other Maisons of the LVMH Group:
Christian Dior Couture Institutional Communication Department and Financial Communication Department
for the management of your requests and queries, as well as to send You newsletters;
Christian Dior Couture Human Resources department
to manage your applications to job offers;
Christian Dior Couture Security Department
to manage cybersecurity of the Website;
Christian Dior Couture Fraud and Legal Departments
to manage fraudulent acts or legal claims if any.
3.4.2
Accessibility by third parties
Certain third parties may have access to your Data, specifically:
(i) our subcontractors and service providers
acting for technical and logistical reasons (carriers, Website hosting, security and maintenance providers, fraud management service providers, technical service providers responsible for sending e-mails and newsletters, anti-spam and anti-bot services, recruitment agencies which may provide Us with advice on the management of our candidates’ databases and help with the selection of profiles within such databases, etc.);
(ii) other LVMH Group affiliates for recruitment purposes
: when you apply to an LVMH Group affiliate’s job offer, this affiliate collects and processes your Data as independent data controller. In such case, your Data will be processed according to this affiliate’s personal data protection policy, which You may obtain by contacting it directly. Likewise, the rights You enjoy pursuant to personal data protection laws must be directly enforced against it;
(iii) any authority, court or other third party
when disclosure is required by law, regulations or a judicial decision, or if such disclosure is necessary to protect and defend our rights.
3.5 Is any Personal Data transferred outside of the European Economic Area?
Your Data is processed in France by the Maison Christian Dior Couture. However, We may rely on certain service providers, which are located abroad or which themselves rely on processors located abroad, including outside of the European Economic Area (EEA) in countries where personal data protection laws differ from those that apply in the EEA.
With reference to the data relating to applications, the LVMH Group has adopted binding corporate rules ("BCR") which the French Supervisory Authority (the CNIL) has declared to be compliant with current legislation and suitable for offering an adequate level. of protection in case of data transfer within the Group, also outside the European Economic Area.
3.6 How long do We store your Data?
Data is stored as long as required for the purpose for which it was collected and, in any case, will be destroyed at the end of such period.
Please see the list below for additional details about these periods.
Any transfer of your Data outside of the EEA will take place with appropriate safeguards in place that comply with applicable personal data protection regulations. Upon request, We will provide You with a copy of applicable safeguards.
Purpose:
Management of your requests and queries
Data categories: Identification Data (last name, first name, mailing address, contact details needed to identify You when You interact with Us).
Period of storage before erasure: Duration required to manage your requests and queries. Your Data will then be either deleted or anonymized, unless we need to keep it to meet our legal obligations for the applicable statutory retention period.
Purpose:
Sending You our newsletters
Data categories: Your email address
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of your subscription. Then, the Data will be destroyed or anonymized.
Purpose:
Management of your applications to job offers
Data categories: Application information
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of two (2) years from when the Data has been provided or from the last contact with You. At the end of this 2-year period, Christian Dior Couture may contact You to know whether You want Christian Dior Couture to keep retaining your Personal Data, for the purpose of informing You of an opportunity that may arise and match your career aspirations and skills. In any event, your Data will be erased at your request, within a maximum period of 1 month from your request.
Purpose:
Security of the Website
Data categories: Technical information of your device (IP address, device type, browser ID, etc.)
Period of storage before erasure: 6 months, then the Data is either deleted or anonymized.
Purpose:
Disputes/complaints
Data categories: Data concerning the dispute/complaint
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of the complaint + 5 years from the complaint.
In the event of a court action: duration of proceedings through full enforcement of the legal decision or settlement agreement
4. What are your rights in relation to your Data?
4.1
Access, rectification and portability
In accordance with current regulations, You have the right to access your Data. You may also request correction of Your Personal Data should they be inaccurate. Depending on the purpose of processing, You also have the right to have incomplete Personal Data completed.
To respond to your request, We may ask You to provide Us with a proof of your identity. We may also need to ask You for additional information or supporting documents. We will make every effort to respond to your request as soon as possible.
You may, to the extent provided for by law, exercise your right to Data portability which allows You to retrieve, in an interoperable format, the Personal Data that You provided to Us.
4.2
Right to erasure of your Data and to limitation of the processing of your Data
You may request erasure of your Personal Data if:
You believe that our processing of your Personal Data is no longer needed for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy,
You believe that the processing is unlawful or You contest the accuracy of the Data We process about You,
You withdrew your consent to the processing of your Data.
Alternatively, to the extent provided for by law, You may request limitation of the processing of your Data.
Please note that despite the exercise of your right to erasure or processing limitation, We will store some of Your Personal Data when the law requires Us to do so, or to exercise or defend our rights.
4.3
Right to establish instructions for the management of your Personal Data after your death
For France and when mandatory local provisions so provide, You may determine how You want Us to handle your Personal Data upon your death.
4.4
Procedure to exercise your Data protection rights
You can exercise your data protection rights in the following ways or if you have any questions or complaints about the processing of your personal data.
by using the following email address:
privacy@christiandior.com
by using the following contact form:
https://www.dior.com/en_us/contact-couture
by mail at the following address: Data Protection Officer, Christian Dior Couture, 11 bis rue François 1er, 75008 Paris, France.
You also have the right to contact Dior’s lead Supervisory Authority, the CNIL, at any time in order to file a complaint against Dior’s data protection and privacy practices. The CNIL can be contacted by using the following information:
Commission Nationale de l'Informatique et des Libertés – CNIL
3 Place de Fontenoy
TSA 80715 - 75334 Paris, Cedex 07
Phone. +33 1 53 73 22 22
Fax +33 1 53 73 22 00
Website:
http://www.cnil.fr/
We also wish to inform you about the contacts of other authorities in Europe that you can find and contact on the website of the European Data Protection Board:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
When the processing of your Data is based on your consent (
e.g
., subscription to the newsletter), You may withdraw your consent at any time without justification. This right can be exercised by changing your options regarding subscriptions to our newsletters by clicking on the hyperlink provided for this purpose in each email We send You.
5. How is your Personal Data secured?
Christian Dior Couture uses technical and organizational measures that comply with French and EU legal and regulatory requirements, to keep your Data secure and confidential. Under written agreements, Christian Dior Couture requires its service providers and processors to provide safeguards and implement sufficient security measures to protect the Personal Data they have agreed to process, in accordance with applicable requirements under personal data protection laws. However, Christian Dior Couture does not control all risks related to the operation of the Internet and draws your attention to the inherent risks of using any website.
6. Third party websites
There may be links to third-party websites (such as LVMH Group affiliates’ websites) that We do not control, and which are governed by their own confidentiality and personal data protection policies. This Privacy Statement does not apply to third-party websites. Please review the confidentiality and personal data protection policies of the third-party websites that You visit to understand how they process your Data. Christian Dior Couture shall not be liable for any use of your Data by any third parties.
PARFUMS CHRISTIAN DIOR - CANDIDATE PRIVACY STATEMENT
Statement relating to the protection of your personal data collected in the context of recruitment
This Privacy Statement for Candidates (hereinafter the “
Privacy Statement
”) is intended to provide visitors and users (“
You
”) of the www.dior.com website, as well as of all the Dior’s websites with .com, .it, .ru, .co, .jp, .cn domain names suffixes (hereinafter collectively the “
Website
”) with information relating to how the Maison Parfums Christian Dior (hereinafter “
Parfums
C
hristian Dior
” or “
We/Us
”) processes your personal data (hereinafter the “
Personal Data
” or “
Data
”) and about your rights in this respect.
Parfums Christian Dior places the highest priority and takes the utmost care to protect your Personal Data.
Who are we? Who is the Data Controller of your Personal data?
During your recruitment experience, and in order to inform you in advance, the Data Controller will be Parfums Christian Dior within the meaning of the regulations applicable to personal data and in particular with regard to article 24 of the Regulations (EU) 2016/679 (hereinafter "GDPR").
As an example, referring to some of the Maison iconic products:
J’adore
Miss Dior
Capture Total
Parfums Christian Dior S.A.
(head office), a public limited company under French law with its head office located at 33 avenue Hoche, Paris 8, France, registered with the Paris Trade and Companies Register under number 552 065 187 and represented by Laurent Kleitman in his capacity as President Director General Parfums Christian Dior,
And all Parfums Christian Dior affiliates
The Dior soul is expressed in each of the Maison's products and in the attention paid to each stage of their manufacture. From Grasse in Paris to the Jardins Dior, Parfums Christian Dior sublimates the finest materials so that each of its creations contributes to its aura around the world.
2. What is a “personal data”?
Personal Data refers to any information or pieces of information that could identify You either directly (
e.g.
your name, surname, email, home address, etc.) or indirectly (
e.g.
through pseudonymized data, such as a unique ID number, etc.). It may also include unique identifiers like your computer’s IP address.
3. Why and how do We use the Personal Data that We collect?
3.1 How do We collect your Personal Data?
We collect your Personal Data as follows:
directly from You
when You use our Website and our services (completion of various forms on the Website, direct communication with Us through our institutional departments, etc.);
automatically
when You access or use the Website (technical details, IP address, browsing information, etc.).
3.2 What Data do We collect?
We collect several types of Personal Data about You:
Personal Data that We collect directly from You
We collect Personal Data that You provide directly when You use our Website.
This is specifically the case when You:
interact with Us through the contact forms,
register to receive our newsletters or institutional documentation,
apply to job offers.
The categories of Personal Data that We collect include:
Identification and contact information:
e.g., last name, first name, mailing address, contact details needed to identify You when You interact with Us,
Application information:
e.g., last name, first name, email address, telephone number, professional experience and all the information You provide by sending your application and/or your curriculum vitae.  We only collect and store this Data in connection with the management of our own job offers and do not use them for any other purposes, including for commercial purposes.
Personal Data that We collect automatically
We automatically collect certain Data about You when You access or use the Website, specifically:
Technical information
: We collect information about the device that You use to login, as well as your use of the Website (
g
., operating system, type of browser used, whether a proxy is used, location of the device inferred from your IP address that identifies your computer, access time, accessed pages and the link that enabled You to access our Website),
Browsing information: We use tracking technologies to collect Data about You when You use our Website.
3.3 On what legal grounds and for which purposes do We use the Data that We collect?
In accordance with current personal data protection regulations, We only collect Personal Data when We have a legal basis to do so.
Personal Data is collected either:
i.          based on pre-contractual measures
ii.          based on your consent,
iii.          in our legitimate interest, or
iv.          to meet our legal obligations.
(i) We collect your Personal Data on the basis of
pre-contractual measures
, in particular in the context of the processing of applications (CV and motivation letter) and management of interviews.
(ii) We collect Personal Data
based on your consent
, for the following purposes
:
Share opportunities
that can match your profile and keep you up to date on the life of Maison Dior,
(iii) We collect Personal Data
based on our legitimate interest
, for the following purposes:
·        to manage your requests and queries: We use your Data to send You the information You request,
to defend our interests
in the event of a dispute or court action
,
to manage cybersecurity
of the Website
,
to prevent fraudulent acts
in order to ensure the security of our assets and contents.
(iv) We may also store your Personal Data when
the law requires Us to do so or to defend our legal rights
.
3.4 Who has access to your Data?
3.4.1
Accessibility within Parfums Christian Dior
Your Data is processed by the Maison Parfums Christian Dior for the purposes described above and are only accessible to Parfums Christian Dior personnel who need to know it to perform their duties.
In this respect, your Personal Data is processed by the following departments of the Maison Parfums Christian Dior and/or other Maisons of the LVMH Group:
Parfums Christian Dior Institutional Communication Department and Financial Communication Department
for the management of your requests and queries, as well as to send You newsletters;
Parfums Christian Dior Human Resources department
to manage your applications to job offers;
Parfums Christian Dior Security Department
to manage cybersecurity of the Website;
Parfums Christian Dior Fraud and Legal Departments
to manage fraudulent acts or legal claims if any.
3.4.2
Accessibility by third parties
Certain third parties may have access to your Data, specifically:
(i) our subcontractors and service providers
acting for technical and logistical reasons (carriers, Website hosting, security and maintenance providers, fraud management service providers, technical service providers responsible for sending e-mails and newsletters, anti-spam and anti-bot services, recruitment agencies which may provide Us with advice on the management of our candidates’ databases and help with the selection of profiles within such databases, etc.);
(ii) other LVMH Group affiliates for recruitment purposes
: when you apply to an LVMH Group affiliate’s job offer, this affiliate collects and processes your Data as independent data controller. In such case, your Data will be processed according to this affiliate’s personal data protection policy, which You may obtain by contacting it directly. Likewise, the rights You enjoy pursuant to personal data protection laws must be directly enforced against it;
(iii) any authority, court or other third party
when disclosure is required by law, regulations or a judicial decision, or if such disclosure is necessary to protect and defend our rights.
3.5 Is any Personal Data transferred outside of the European Economic Area?
Your Data is processed in France by the Maison Parfums Christian Dior. However, We may rely on certain service providers, which are located abroad or which themselves rely on processors located abroad, including outside of the European Economic Area (EEA) in countries where personal data protection laws differ from those that apply in the EEA.
With reference to the data relating to applications, the LVMH Group has adopted binding corporate rules ("BCR") which the French Supervisory Authority (the CNIL) has declared to be compliant with current legislation and suitable for offering an adequate level. of protection in case of data transfer within the Group, also outside the European Economic Area.
3.6 How long do We store your Data?
Data is stored as long as required for the purpose for which it was collected and, in any case, will be destroyed at the end of such period.
Please see the list below for additional details about these periods.
Any transfer of your Data outside of the EEA will take place with appropriate safeguards in place that comply with applicable personal data protection regulations. Upon request, We will provide You with a copy of applicable safeguards.
Purpose:
Management of your requests and queries
Data categories: Identification Data (last name, first name, mailing address, contact details needed to identify You when You interact with Us).
Period of storage before erasure: Duration required to manage your requests and queries. Your Data will then be either deleted or anonymized, unless we need to keep it to meet our legal obligations for the applicable statutory retention period.
Purpose:
Sending You our newsletters
Data categories: Your email address
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of your subscription. Then, the Data will be destroyed or anonymized.
Purpose:
Management of your applications to job offers
Data categories: Application information
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of two (2) years from when the Data has been provided or from the last contact with You. At the end of this 2-year period, Parfums Christian Dior may contact You to know whether You want Parfums Christian Dior to keep retaining your Personal Data, for the purpose of informing You of an opportunity that may arise and match your career aspirations and skills. In any event, your Data will be erased at your request, within a maximum period of 1 month from your request.
Purpose:
Security of the Website
Data categories: Technical information of your device (IP address, device type, browser ID, etc.)
Period of storage before erasure: 6 months, then the Data is either deleted or anonymized.
Purpose:
Disputes/complaints
Data categories: Data concerning the dispute/complaint
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of the complaint + 5 years from the complaint.
In the event of a court action: duration of proceedings through full enforcement of the legal decision or settlement agreement
4. What are your rights in relation to your Data?
4.1
Access, rectification and portability
In accordance with current regulations, You have the right to access your Data. You may also request correction of Your Personal Data should they be inaccurate. Depending on the purpose of processing, You also have the right to have incomplete Personal Data completed.
To respond to your request, We may ask You to provide Us with a proof of your identity. We may also need to ask You for additional information or supporting documents. We will make every effort to respond to your request as soon as possible.
You may, to the extent provided for by law, exercise your right to Data portability which allows You to retrieve, in an interoperable format, the Personal Data that You provided to Us.
4.2
Right to erasure of your Data and to limitation of the processing of your Data
You may request erasure of your Personal Data if:
You believe that our processing of your Personal Data is no longer needed for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy,
You believe that the processing is unlawful or You contest the accuracy of the Data We process about You,
You withdrew your consent to the processing of your Data.
Alternatively, to the extent provided for by law, You may request limitation of the processing of your Data.
Please note that despite the exercise of your right to erasure or processing limitation, We will store some of Your Personal Data when the law requires Us to do so, or to exercise or defend our rights.
4.3
Right to establish instructions for the management of your Personal Data after your death
For France and when mandatory local provisions so provide, You may determine how You want Us to handle your Personal Data upon your death.
4.4
Procedure to exercise your Data protection rights
Vous pouvez exercer vos droits en matière de protection des Données selon les modalités suivantes ou si vous avez des questions ou réclamations concernant le traitement de vos données personnelles.
by using the following email address:
gdpr_hr@diormail.com
by using the following contact form:
https://www.dior.com/en_gb/contact-parfum
by mail at the following address: Data Protection Officer, Parfums Christian Dior, 190 avenue Charles de Gaulle, 92200 Neuilly sur Seine, France.
You also have the right to contact Dior’s lead Supervisory Authority, the CNIL, at any time in order to file a complaint against Dior’s data protection and privacy practices. The CNIL can be contacted by using
the following information:
Commission Nationale de l'Informatique et des Libertés – CNIL
3 Place de Fontenoy
TSA 80715 - 75334 Paris, Cedex 07
Phone. +33 1 53 73 22 22
Fax +33 1 53 73 22 00
Website:
http://www.cnil.fr/
We also wish to inform you about the contacts of other authorities in Europe that you can find and contact on the website of the European Data Protection Board:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
When the processing of your Data is based on your consent (
e.g
., subscription to the newsletter), You may withdraw your consent at any time without justification. This right can be exercised by changing your options regarding subscriptions to our newsletters by clicking on the hyperlink provided for this purpose in each email We send You.
5. How is your Personal Data secured?
Parfums Christian Dior
uses technical and organizational measures that comply with French and EU legal and regulatory requirements, to keep your Data secure and confidential. Under written agreements,
Parfums Christian Dior
requires its service providers and processors to provide safeguards and implement sufficient security measures to protect the Personal Data they have agreed to process, in accordance with applicable requirements under personal data protection laws. However,
Parfums Christian Dior
does not control all risks related to the operation of the Internet and draws your attention to the inherent risks of using any website.
6. Third party websites
There may be links to third-party websites (such as LVMH Group affiliates’ websites) that We do not control, and which are governed by their own confidentiality and personal data protection policies. This Privacy Statement does not apply to third-party websites. Please review the confidentiality and personal data protection policies of the third-party websites that You visit to understand how they process your Data.
Parfums Christian Dior
shall not be liable for any use of your Data by any third parties.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.dior.com/en_int/fashion/personal-data#christian-dior-privacy-policy-how-does-dior-protect-childrens-privacy:
Go to the menu
Go to the content
Personal Data
PERSONAL DATA
CHRISTIAN DIOR PRIVACY POLICY (19)
PRIVACY STATEMENT - CHRISTIAN DIOR COUTURE
WHO ARE WE?
WHAT DATA MAY WE COLLECT OR RECEIVE ABOUT YOU?
HOW DO WE COLLECT OR RECEIVE YOUR DATA?
FOR WHAT PURPOSES ARE YOUR DATA USED BY DIOR?
FOR HOW LONG MAY WE KEEP IT?
WHO MAY ACCESS YOUR DATA?
HOW DO WE PROTECT IT AND KEEP IT CONFIDENTIAL?
HOW DO WE ADDRESS CROSS-BORDER PROTECTIONS?
WHAT ADDITIONAL RIGHTS ARE PROVIDED FOR RESIDENTS OF CERTAIN REGIONS?
HOW DOES DIOR PROTECT CHILDREN'S PRIVACY?
UPDATES TO THIS STATEMENT
CONTACT US
NOTICE ABOUT COOKIE MANAGEMENT
NOTICE ABOUT SOCIAL LOGIN
NOTICE ON THE PROCESSING OF DATA SHARED WITH THE LVMH GROUP
NOTICE ABOUT 30 MONTAIGNE ACTIVITIES
CHRISTIAN DIOR COUTURE - CANDIDATE PRIVACY STATEMENT
PARFUMS CHRISTIAN DIOR - CANDIDATE PRIVACY STATEMENT
CHRISTIAN DIOR PRIVACY POLICY (19)
PRIVACY STATEMENT - CHRISTIAN DIOR COUTURE
Last Updated: 05-2024
Confidentiality and security of your personal data are important to us. We would like to offer you personalized services while respecting your privacy and choices.
This Privacy Statement (“Statement”) is provided by The Maison Christian Dior Couture (“Maison,” “we” or “us”), a luxury retail and wholesale brand with its global headquarters in Paris, France.
The purpose of this Statement is to inform you in a transparent and simple manner about the processing of the personal data that you provide or that we collect through the different touchpoints you use to interact with us (e.g. in store, client services, dior.com, social media, digital apps, events), about possible transfers to third parties, as well as your rights and options to control your personal data and protect your privacy.
An easy to read and dedicated micro Privacy Statement is available via this
link
. It summarizes at high level the processing of your personal data By Christian Dior Couture.
WHO ARE WE?
The Maison Christian Dior Couture
Christian Dior Couture SA
(head office), a public limited company under French law with its head office located at 30 avenue Montaigne, 75008 Paris, France, and
all of the Christian Dior Couture affiliates with whom you share your information.
Christian Dior Couture
is a story of dreams and elegance, passion and excellence; it is also a story of know-how. The creations of Christian Dior Couture express the passion for beautiful gestures and exceptional objects. From haute couture to ready-to-wear, including leather goods, watchmaking and jewelry, know-how is transformed into the art of making.
Who we are?
What data may we collect or receive about you?
How do we collect or receive your data?
For what purposes are your data used by Dior?
For how long may we keep it?
Who may access your data?
How do we protect it and keep it confidential?
How do we address cross-border protections?
What additional protections are provided for residents of certain regions?
How does Dior protect children's privacy?
Contact Us
WHAT DATA MAY WE COLLECT OR RECEIVE ABOUT YOU?
"Personal data" means any information that could reasonably identify you either directly (e.g. your name) or indirectly (e.g. through a unique client ID number).
The personal data we collect depends upon the touchpoint of our interaction and is also limited to that which is relevant and appropriate for the interaction.  Unless you choose to interact with us via other touchpoints, such as (but not limited to) by making a purchase on our site, signing up for one of our programs or services, using our apps, communicating with us via email, phone or submitting online forms, or posting a comment or a like online, our data collection is limited to the use of ‘cookies’ for website visitors.
For customers and other individuals who sign up for programs or services or otherwise interact with us beyond browsing our site via the touchpoints described above, for example, we collect certain relevant information from you. The information we collect is related to the particular transaction as well as our overall relationship with you.  For example, if you make purchases from Dior.com or in our stores, we must collect information to process (and, if relevant, fulfill and ship) your order. We generally collect your contact details, contact preferences, and information that will allow us to make recommendations to you about our products or services that may be of interest.  We may centralize the information pertaining to our customers so that we have it organized in one place, as this helps us manage our relationship with you as well as your choices and preferences. Or, if you subscribe to our personalised newsletter, we collect your email address.
Should you wish to know more about the types of information we collect, please refer to the dedicated table provided via this
link
.
We invite you to keep us regularly informed in writing of any change in your contact details.
We Collect and Use Limited Sensitive Information.
As described above, we collect personal data that is described under some laws as sensitive personal data,” special categories of personal data, sensitive personal information, or similar terms (collectively referred to here as “Sensitive Personal Data”).  Here, we provide more information about which categories of the personal data described above may be designated as Sensitive Personal Data, and how we use these categories of Sensitive Personal Data.  We only use Sensitive Personal Data to provide you goods and services, and do not use such information to infer characteristics about you. Depending on what you choose to provide and how we interact with you, we may collect:
Account log-ins to provide Dior products and services. Account login information is used to identify an active user on any site that requires login. Login information includes first and last name and corresponding email for such account, as well as the associated account password.
Financial information to process your orders.  We collect and use credit or debit card information and required security or access codes in order to process payments and fulfill any order you make.
Passport-related information to process your orders.  We may collect passport or other government-issued ID information in connection with an order, including when you are purchasing a product in a country other than that in which you live, in order for you to make purchases free of value added tax (VAT).
HOW DO WE COLLECT OR RECEIVE YOUR DATA?
We may collect or receive data via the following touchpoints:
Use of Dior.com;
In-store, including in communication with our salesperson;
Dior events you attend;
Public Relations relationship and communication;
Contact with the Client Services;
Forms you complete (in store or online);
During your purchase journey, you will be able to choose between i) logging into your existing Dior account, ii) creating a new account, or iii) paying as a Guest;
Digital apps you use;
Digital experiences such as virtual beauty technology in store (if you choose to use that technology where offered via a retailer), or our third-party vendors may receive data via virtual try-on online;
Dior social media pages you visit or interact with, or other social media pages on which you post Dior content or comments;
Digital media advertising you click on;
Search engines’ paid advertising you click on;
Retailers (such as Department Stores) in which you have purchased a Dior product and in which you consented (e.g. via an iPad) to have your details shared with our Maison to receive its communications; or
Surveys or satisfaction questionnaires you answer.
FOR WHAT PURPOSES ARE YOUR DATA USED BY DIOR?
Depending on the context in which your data is collected, we use your data for:
the provision of Dior products and services, including the management of your orders, the management of personalized content, communications and interactions with Dior (digital or otherwise), and providing customer support;
the facilitation of showing you what your selected product would look like on you (in relation to using our try-on technology, though when online, all processing for providing the feature is done by our third-party vendors’ proprietary technology), and for certain in-store virtual try-ons, offering you the option of receiving your photo via email;
the management of your account and profile (for example, in order to simplify your navigation through our different country-specific websites, if you navigate to another country your customer account will automatically be duplicated in that market. This means that it will not be necessary to create a new customer account);
analyse the performance of our Maison on social networks in order to produce statistical analyses (studies of results by country, influence of the Maison and analysis of the campaigns implemented).
analyse your preferences and habits, anticipate your needs from your consumer profile and your publications/mentions on social networks.
personalised customer experience: we may provide you with personalised communications by means of email, postal mail, SMS or calls based on the communication preferences you have indicated and your consumer profile (where permitted) (if you have an account, please connect to either your Parfums Christian Dior account or your Christian Dior Couture account to modify your channel preferences.  Otherwise you can contact our customer service (see "Contact Us" section below)). With your free, specific, informed and unambiguous consent (where required), we use your personal data to send you personalised communications based on your interests (newsletters, offers, invitations and surveys).
In the latter two interactions (“analysing your preferences and habits” & “providing you with a personalised customer experience”), when we send personalised communications or content, we may use so-called profiling techniques. For the sake of transparency within this Statement, profiling is currently defined as any kind of automated processing of personal data which consists of using that personal data to evaluate certain personal aspects relating to a natural person, in particular to analyse or predict elements relating to the preferences, interests, behaviour or location of that natural person. In these circumstances, you have the right to opt-out, meaning the right to withdraw your consent by unsubscribing or see the “Contact Us” section below.
Should you wish to know more about the categories of processing activities for which we collect and use your information alongside indicative Legal basis for which we base such processing, please refer to the dedicated table provided via this
link
FOR HOW LONG MAY WE KEEP IT?
Please note that each Maison has its own retention periods that include the requirements regarding the products each Maison offers.
Unless otherwise stated, we only keep your personal data for as long as we need it to fulfill the purpose of collection, to meet your needs, or to comply with our legal or business obligations, and to fulfill the purposes described above in this Privacy Statement. By way of example, we keep your data for up to 10 years from the date of your last purchase if you are a client and up to 3 years if you are a prospect from the date of your last interaction with us.
When you choose to use our virtual try-on technology:
in store (where offered via a retailer) the photos or images connected with that use are stored for a maximum period of 7 days, and then irreversibly erased;
Online, the photos, images, and information processed to apply the selected beauty or try-on feature is never possessed by Dior (rather it is only possessed by our third-party vendor) and is not retained or stored.
When we no longer need to use your personal data, it is removed from our systems and records or anonymized so that you can no longer be identified from it.
We use the following criteria to determine how long to retain personal data:
Our relationship with you, and the products and services we provide to you;
Your requests to us regarding your information, or our products or services;
Any legal obligations to retain the data, or for our own legal purposes (such as enforcing our agreements or litigation);
Recommendations and legal requirements, including applicable international, national, federal and state statutes; and
Technical considerations and feasibility, and level of protections in place for your personal data.
WHO MAY ACCESS YOUR DATA?
We communicate your information, including if possible in a form that does not allow a direct identification, to:
Other Dior entities as well as department stores where you buy our products in order to provide you with identical personalized service worldwide
Our trusted third-party providers, including other entities of the LVMH group, acting as subcontractors according to our instructions and on our behalf only
For example, we entrust certain services to third parties responsible for delivering a product to you, payment service providers and transaction security against fraud, third parties who assist us in the organization of our events, third parties providing services IT, digital communication and public relations agencies, third parties who assist us in customer care, third parties who assist us in qualitative surveys of our products, programs or services.
Third parties including the LVMH group wishing to know your preferences and consumption trends for our programs and services in order to improve visibility, accessibility and performance
Our trusted third-party partners assist us in the management of your orders. In particular, we entrust certain services to third parties responsible for delivering a product to you, to payment service providers and to providers ensuring the security of anti-fraud transactions.
Third-party partners, who provide advertising, marketing, website performance, analytics, and similar services for Dior, including cookies or other trackers, including for the purposes of behavior-based targeted advertising.
Please note that these third-party partners may act as data controllers; in such cases, they have their own privacy policies. These third parties include:
Third parties in the event of a change of control, for legal reasons, or with your prior consent
Third parties wishing to know your main interests to constitute similar audiences and target prospects that match your profile. In the context of this specific data processing, Dior is not the Data Controller relating to prospecting and you will not be subject to prospecting, your data is only used to constitute profiles similar to yours
We may also offer you the possibility of using your social media connection data. Please note that in this case, you are sharing your profile information with us. The personal data shared depends on the configuration of the social network platform. Please note that these social networks apply their own privacy policy.
We illustrate some examples below:
- Facebook (Privacy policy accessible
here
)
- Google (Privacy policy
here
)
- Instagram (Privacy policy accessible
here
)
Third parties conducting statistics on our performance on social networks on our behalf
Third parties such as IAS (International Accreditation Service), which assists us, for example, in finding out the exposure rate of our created formats. For more information, their privacy policy is available
here
.
Should you wish to know more about Third Parties our Maison may use to process your personal information, please refer to the dedicated and illustrative table provided via this
link
.
HOW DO WE PROTECT IT AND KEEP IT CONFIDENTIAL?
We have adopted reasonable and appropriate physical, technical and organizational security safeguards to protect your data from loss, misuse, alteration, destruction or access by unauthorized third parties. The Internet, wireless networks and information storage are not 100% secure. We cannot guarantee the security of your personal data stored or sent to us. We encourage you to take precautions to protect your personal data. For example, in creating your account on dior.com, entering a personal password complying with our security requirements is compulsory and part of this Privacy Statement.
The security safeguards that we have adopted are commensurate with the sensitivity of the particular data collected.  For example, credit, debit and other payment information is subject to stricter security measures.
Regarding your purchases, your bank details are encrypted through Dior servers. Payments are made via a secure payment platform which is PCI-DSS certified, supplemented by control measures, to ensure the security of purchases made and to fight against fraud.
We also require our partners and group companies to uphold a substantially similar level of protection for your data. The measures are evaluated and updated to address new threats and challenges, as well as new legal requirements in the countries where we operate.
To the maximum extent allowed by applicable law, you agree and acknowledge that Dior will not be liable or responsible for use or disclosure of your information that is the result of unauthorized or illegal access to our systems or those of our vendors, agents, contractors, affiliates, or partners. If you have reason to believe that the security of your communications or personal data has been compromised, please notify us immediately using the contact information below.
HOW DO WE ADDRESS CROSS-BORDER PROTECTIONS?
Because Dior operates in many countries across the world, some of your data may be collected, accessible or stored outside of your country of residence.  You should know that the data protection and security requirements differ from place to place and may not offer the same level of protection as those in your home country.  Nevertheless, Dior and our group companies have taken steps to ensure an adequate level of protection of your data irrespective of where it is located, such as by using data transfer methods approved by the European Commission (where the data protection laws are considered to be the strongest worldwide).  We also require our third-party partners to fulfill applicable data transfer obligations in relation to the personal data that they receive on our behalf.
In this context:
- Christian Dior Couture and all of its affiliates have entered into a Personal Data Processing and Transfer Agreement
- In specific cases and roles, Christian Dior Couture and other Maisons legally independent from Christian Dior Couture, such as Parfums Christian Dior, have entered into a Data Processing and Transfer Agreement
WHAT ADDITIONAL RIGHTS ARE PROVIDED FOR RESIDENTS OF CERTAIN REGIONS?
Dior has adopted the data protection and security practices described in this Statement for all individuals within scope.  In addition, we also recognize and have addressed data protection and security measures that are required on a local or regional level.  This includes, for example, those required for residents of the European Union/European Economic Area under the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) 2016/679.
In particular, the GDPR provides the following rights (with some exceptions):
The right to be informed: you have the right to obtain clear, transparent and easily understandable information about how we use your personal data, and your rights. You will find all this information in this Statement;
The right of access: you have the right to access to the personal data Dior holds about you;
The right to restriction; you have the right to suspend the use of your personal data in certain cases;
The right of rectification: you have the right to have your personal data rectified if it is incorrect or outdated and / or completed if it is incomplete;
The right to erasure / right to be forgotten: you have the right to have your personal data erased or deleted. Please note this is not an absolute right, as we may have legal or legitimate grounds for retaining your personal data;
The right to object to direct marketing: you can unsubscribe or opt out of our direct marketing communication at any time. You are able to do so by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link in any email or communication we send you. You are also able to request to receive non-personalized communications about our products and services;
The right to withdraw consent at any time for data processing based on consent: You can withdraw your consent to our processing of your data when such processing is based on consent; and
The right to data portability: you have the right to move, copy or transfer data from our database to another. This only applies to data that you have provided, where processing is based on a contract or your consent, and the processing is carried out by automated means.
You are also entitled to determine your personal data protection guidelines and directives in the event of death or extern circumstances.
You also have the right to contact the data protection authority of your country in order to lodge a complaint against the data protection and privacy practices of Dior.
We also wish to inform you about the contacts of other authorities in Europe that you can find and contact on the website of the European Data Protection Board:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_fr
.
We may require proof of your identity and full details of your request before we process it.
HOW DOES DIOR PROTECT CHILDREN'S PRIVACY?
Dior has adopted practices that are designed to ensure that we do not intentionally or knowingly collect or maintain any information from children under the age of 16, though we do not monitor the age of users of our services. If we learn that we mistakenly collected any information from anyone under the age of 16, we will purge it immediately, except for responding to a question or inquiry on a one-time basis from his/her parent or legal guardian. If you are under the age of 16, you should not submit personal data on this website or any other website without the consent of your parent or guardian. If a parent or guardian of a child under 16 believes that the child has provided us with personal data, the parent or guardian of that child should contact us, see “Contact Us” section below.
We do not knowingly sell or share the information of children of any age.
UPDATES TO THIS STATEMENT
Dior reserves the right to change this Statement at any time at its sole discretion and will post the date it was last updated at the top of this Statement. Such changes shall be effective immediately upon posting them to Dior’s website, or otherwise providing them to you. We will provide additional notice to you if we make any changes that materially affect your privacy rights.
CONTACT US
If you have any general questions or concerns about how we process and use your personal data or would like to exercise any of your privacy rights, you may contact us at the following details:
By email to:
privacy@christiandior.com
By phone to Dior Customer Service Centre relevant number of your location as provided here:
CONTACT | DIOR
NOTICE ABOUT COOKIE MANAGEMENT
This Notice about cookies applies when visiting the website available at Dior.com (hereinafter the “Website(s)”), which belongs to Christian Dior Couture and Parfums Christian Dior (hereinafter “Dior”).
The purpose of this cookie policy is to inform you of the source and use of browsing information collected during your visit to the Website and the tools provided to allow you to express your choices about cookies.
WHAT IS A COOKIE?
Subject to your choices, when visiting the Website, a text file may be placed on your device (computer, smartphone, tablet), courtesy of your web browser.
This text file is a cookie. During its validity or registration period, it will allow the sender to identify your device on future visits.
Some cookies are essential for using the Website, others optimize and personalize the contents displayed.
WHO SENDS THE COOKIES ON OUR WEBSITE?
Cookies that may be saved to your device when you visit the Website pages are issued by Dior and/or third parties. Only the cookie issuer is likely to read or modify the information contained within it.
Cookies sent by Dior are mainly related to the operation of the Website.
The others are third party cookies sent by our partners or advertising agencies, via the advertisements shown on our Website. The examples below are for illustration purposes:
Personal_id (twitter.com)
Role: When Twitter acts as a third-party host, it collects data via a range of plug-ins and integrations, which are primarily used for targeting and tracking.
Link to privacy policy:
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Identity_fbp (doubleclick.net)
Role: Doubleclick is Google’s real-time auction ad exchange
Link to privacy policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en#infocollect
Identity_xttrk2_ids (cstatic.weborama.fr)
Role: Weborama is an online advertising company based in France.
Link to privacy policy:
https://weborama.com/en/weborama-privacy-commitment/
Dior makes every effort to ensure that third-party cookies are issued and used in compliance with the applicable regulations.
WHAT IS THE PURPOSE OF THE COOKIES ISSUED VIA THE WEBSITE?
Subject to your choices, various cookies may be installed on your device for the purposes detailed below. For the sake of transparency and in as much depth as possible, we inform you of the purposes of the third-party cookies that we are aware of, and the ways in which you can make choices about these cookies. All cookies may be cross-referenced with your customer data in order to personalize your experience, limit commercial interaction, ensure the proper functioning of your loyalty benefits, improve our services and guarantee your satisfaction.
Essential cookies for Website operations
“Essential” cookies are necessary for Website browsing and allow you to use the Website’s main features.
For example, these cookies are intended particularly for:
-         saving your choices or desire not to make a choice about tracker cookies;
-         service authentication;
-         saving the contents of a shopping cart;
-         customizing the interface.
Removing them may make it hard to browse the Website or may make it impossible to place an order. These cookies may be installed on your device by Dior or its service providers.
These cookies enable or facilitate digital communications and/or may be strictly necessary for the provision of an online communication service at your express request. As a result, they do not require your prior consent. Saving or reading such cookies is necessary for provision of the service and will be based on Dior’s legitimate interest in implementing such processing for the proper use of its Website.
Personalization cookies
Personalization cookies allow us to personalize and improve your user experience, for example by making your searches easier and optimizing your shopping experience. They also allow us to adapt the look of the Website to your device display during your visits.
These Cookies are issued by Dior and/or by our service providers. The issue and use of cookies by third parties on our Website may also be subject to the privacy protection policies of these third parties.
Such cookies are saved or read, subject to your prior consent. If you refuse these cookies, you will not be able to benefit from the functionalities described in this paragraph.
Analytical cookies
Analytical cookies make it possible to gauge the audience for various Website content, to establish visitor statistics and volumes in order to evaluate and improve our service ergonomics. These cookies include those used to create similar profiles that will be prospected according to your information.
These Cookies are issued by Dior and/or by our service providers. The issue and use of cookies by third parties on our Website may also be subject to the privacy protection policies of these third parties.
The information communicated to technical service providers is transmitted in the form of aggregate statistics and traffic volumes, excluding any personal information. These statistics are reconciled with the traffic statistics of other websites, as well as with your customer data.
Such cookies are saved or read, subject to your prior consent. Refusing the implementation of or deleting such cookies does not affect your Website browsing but is likely to prevent us from ensuring the best quality of service we wish to offer our visitors.
Sharing cookies (social links)
Our Website may include third-party computer applications that allow you to share Website content with others, or to publish your visit or opinion of Website content to these other persons. This is notably the case for “Share” and “Like” buttons on social networks such as Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Pinterest, etc.
The social network providing such application buttons is likely to identify you through this button, if you use the button, and even if you have not used this button but are signed in to the social network when you consult the Website (open session during your browsing). Share buttons will allow you to connect the contents consulted to your user account.
We have no control over the process social networks use to collect information about your Website browsing and associated with the personal data at their disposal. We invite you to consult the privacy protection policies of these social networks.
Advertising cookies
Advertising cookies are not essential for browsing but allow you to see more relevant advertisements personalized to your interests on the Website as well as other websites you may browse. As such, advertising cookies allow, for example, the display of advertising, capping the display (not presenting the same advertising to a user in a repetitive manner), combatting click fraud, billing the display service, the measurement of targets more interested in the advertising to better understand the audience, etc.
Advertising content personalization can also be achieved by using our partner’s technology, to associate your device’s Website browsing information with the data you provided us when you registered.
Saving or reading such cookies is subject to your prior consent. Refusing these advertising cookies has no impact on your use of the Website, nor will it stop advertising on the Website. However, we will be unable to offer you advertising that takes your interests into account.
How long are the cookies kept?
Cookies saved on your device have a maximum lifespan of thirteen (13) months. At the end of this period, personal data collected through the cookies will be deleted.
HOW TO MANAGE COOKIES SAVED ON YOUR DEVICE
Cookies saved on your device result from the settings you have chosen during your visit, which can be modified at any time under the conditions detailed in this cookie policy.
There are various ways to manage the implementation of cookies, as presented below.
If your device is used by more than one person and operates more than one browser, we cannot be certain that the services and advertisements sent to your device are appropriate for your personal use of your device, rather than of another user of your device. If you choose to share your device and browser cookie settings with others, you are responsible for doing so at your own discretion.
You can express your choices using:
The cookie manager
You can decide whether cookies are saved on your device using the cookie settings tool by
clicking here
, in the cookie banner or in the Website footer.
Cookies are managed for cookie purposes.
Your browser settings
You can also configure your browser to accept and save cookies on your device or to reject them.
Each browser has different settings. These are usually described in your browser help menu. We therefore recommend reading it. This will show you how to change your cookie preferences.
For Internet Explorer:
https://support.microsoft.com/en-gb/help/17442/windows-internet-explorer-delete-manage-cookies
For Safari:
https://support.apple.com/en-euro/guide/safari/sfri11471/mac
For Chrome:
https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en&hlrm=en
For Firefox:
https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/cookies-information-websites-store-on-your-computer
For Opera:
https://help.opera.com/en/latest/web-preferences/#cookies
Please note: any choices in your browser settings concerning the acceptance or refusal of cookies will be likely to modify your Internet browsing experience and your access to the Website and certain services requiring the use of these same cookies.
On the Youronlinechoices website
You can connect to the Youronlinechoices website (
https://www.youronlinechoices.com/uk/your-ad-choices
) built by digital advertising professionals. This website allows you to refuse or accept cookies that may be used to personalize the advertisements shown to you while you browse. This European platform is shared by hundreds of Internet advertising professionals. However, this will not prevent advertisements from being displayed on the websites you visit. It will only block technologies that allow advertising to be tailored to your interests.
NOTICE ABOUT SOCIAL LOGIN
Privacy Notice – Register using social providers
For what activities personal data are processed
By creating a Dior account, logging on Dior.com via Google, Facebook, Line, Kakao or by binding your Dior account to your Google, Facebook, Line, Kakao accounts, in this case, you are sharing your profile information with us. The personal data shared depends on the configuration of the social network platform.
In order to facilitate the account creation process, we can pre-fill the account creation form with information retrieved from the social provider account.
What data are exactly involved :
The types of information that Dior can collect depends on the settings selected for that provider and is subjected to the processing details under their own established privacy policies. Here are the types of information per
Google :
first name and last name, e-mail, language preferences (not used), profile picture (not used)
Facebook
: first name and last name, e-mail, profile picture (not used)
Kakao login :
fullname (not used), e-mail, phone number
Line
:
first name and last name, e-mail, phone number, profile picture (not used)
3. Who is the Data controller
: is Christian Dior Couture SA (registered office), a public limited company under French law whose registered office is located at 30 avenue Montaigne, Paris 8, France, and all the affiliates of Christian Dior Couture with whom you share your information.
Please note that as displayed in the section “Who may access your data” referred to in our global Privacy Statement   your social media connection data is administered and managed by the above listed social media platforms acting on your social media account and may act as Data Controller. Please note that these social networks apply their own privacy policy, settings and standards.
4. Where can I find further information?
Please contact us as below if you wish to exercise your rights under applicable Data Protection Laws or if you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your personal data.
- By email at
privacy@christiandior.com
- By postal mail: Christian Dior Couture, 30 avenue Montaigne, 75008 Paris, France
More details can be found in our global Privacy Statement at
https://www.dior.com/en_gb/fashion/personal-data
NOTICE ON THE PROCESSING OF DATA SHARED WITH THE LVMH GROUP
What is the context of the processing?
Christian Dior Couture belongs to the LVMH Group, which comprises many exceptional Maisons that offer high quality products and services in all sectors including  Fashion & Leather Goods, Perfumes & Cosmetics, Watches & Jewelry, Wines & Spirits, Selective Retailing and Hospitality, Culture & leisure. The list of all LVMH Maisons is available at https://www.lvmh.com. If you are customer of our Maison, you may also be a customer of other LVMH Maisons.
What is the purpose of the processing?
We endeavor to improve your experience across the LVMH Maisons you sent to by proposing personalized offers and services and customized marketing communications that correspond to your interests across LVMH Maisons. This relies on knowing your preferences and interests. We will be able to enrich your Dior profile with this information.
How is the processing conducted?
If you consent we will share the purchases you have made with us during the last 3 years with LVMH, our parent company, in a pseudonymous way (which means that your name and your contact details will not be sent to LVMH). Your purchases will be analyzed and matched with purchases made from other Maisons of the LVMH Group where you have given a similar consent. Each Maison that has your consent will receive back from LVMH generalized information concerning your purchasing habits and preferences with other Maisons, and Dior may reach out to you to offer Dior products based on this information. Should you wish further information on how we process or share your personal data, please visit the dedicated sections of the general Dior Privacy Statement: “FOR WHAT PURPOSES is your data used by Dior?” and “WHO can access your data?”
Who is the Data Controller?
Christian Dior Couture will remain the sole data controller which means that it is the company that is responsible for the information that you provide to it. LVMH acts as our data processor, or service provider, and will not use your data for any purpose other than the one described above. For example, LVMH will not use your data for its own purposes, will not contact you for marketing purposes based on the data we provide, and will not share information about you with Maisons of the LVMH Group to which you are not a customer and/or to whom you have not given consent.
NOTICE ABOUT 30 MONTAIGNE ACTIVITIES
PRIVACY STATEMENT - CHRISTIAN DIOR –  30 Montaigne Hotel, Restaurant and Gallery
The Maison Christian Dior Couture attaches particular importance to the processing, confidentiality and security of your personal data. We are committed to offering you personalized services while respecting your privacy and personal choices.
The purpose of this privacy policy is to inform you in a clear, simple and complete manner of the processing carried out on the personal data that you provide to us, or that each of our Affiliates can collect from the various outlets, contact you may have with us (e.g. shop, Customer Service, dior.com, social networks, digital applications, events), their possible transfer to third parties as well as your rights and the options you have to control your information protect your privacy, in accordance with current regulations.
In particular,
this Privacy Statement is dedicated to the collection, handling and usage of your personal data during your various interaction with the a) Hotel, b) the Restaurant or c) the Gallery
located at 30 Montaigne (also named herewith as “
30 Montaigne
”). Throughout this dedicated Privacy Statement, in relation to other processing activities, notably with regards to your purchases of Dior products, please refer to the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link
.
The Data Controller will be Maison Christian Dior Couture, within the meaning of the regulations applicable to personal data and in particular with regard to article 24 of the Regulations (EU) 2016/679 (hereinafter "GDPR").
In this Statement dedicated to the activities of the “30 Montaigne” and your interaction with it, you will find information about:
• Who are we?
• What data we may collect about you
• How we collect or receive your data
• For what purposes we use your data
• How long we keep them
• Who are the recipients of your data
• How we protect them and ensure their confidentiality
• How we treat your preferences and your rights stemming from European Regulation
• The additional protections we offer to residents of certain regions
• How to contact us if you have questions about our use of your personal data
•Modification of this privacy statement
WHO are we ?
The Maison Christian Dior Couture
Christian Dior Couture SA
(head office), a public limited company under French law with its head office located at 30 avenue Montaigne, Paris 8, France, registered in the Paris Trade and Companies Register under number 612 035 832 and represented by Hien Tran Trung in his capacity as Administrative and Financial Director of Christian Dior Couture,
And all of the Christian Dior Couture affiliates with whom you share your information
Christian Dior Couture is a story of dreams and elegance, passion and excellence; it is also a story of know-how. The creations of Christian Dior Couture express the passion for beautiful gestures and exceptional objects. From haute couture to ready-to-wear, including leather goods, watchmaking and jewelry, know-how is transformed into the art of making.
WHAT data do we collect about you?
"Personal data" means any information that identifies you either directly (such as your name) or indirectly (for example, using a unique customer number).
The personal data we collect depends on the point of contact through which you interact with us, as well as the purposes of this interaction as described in this Policy and are also limited to those which are relevant and appropriate for this interaction. Visitors to the Dior.com website, or applicable websites for the “30 Montaigne”, who view our products, services information and offers can choose to do so without logging in, and the same is true for point-of-sale search and browsing on social media. Unless you choose to interact with us through these contact points, for example:
• by making a purchase on our dedicated sites,
• by subscribing to one of our programs or services,
• by writing to us via the consumer contact forms,
• or by writing us a comment in the free online order fields,
or else, our data collection is limited to the use of "cookies" (visitors) for website visitors whose conditions are specifically defined by our cookie policy and according to your preferences. For the sake of transparency and clarity, our cookie management policy is separate from this general policy. The cookie management policy is accessible from this link.
Depending on the data that you communicate to us or that you share with us, personal data may include information concerning:
• Your identity and contact details: surname, first name, postal address, email address, telephone number, and for the “30 Montaigne” Hotel only: Passport details
• Your interests
• A history of your purchases (in store or online, including your orders, tracking and invoices, amount and type of purchase)
• Your requests via our customer service or our public relations service
• The Dior events in which you participate
• Your food intolerance in relation to the “30 Montaigne” Restaurant
• Your satisfaction and comments on our programs, services and products
Regarding your purchases, payments are made via a secure payment platform, supplemented by control measures, including encryption of contact details, in order to guarantee the security of purchases made and to fight against fraud. Your bank details are therefore not accessible on Dior's servers.
We invite you to ensure that your data is regularly updated, either by modifying it directly on our sites or, by informing us in writing of any modification by referring to the dedicated section "How to contact us".
HOW do we collect or receive your data?
As part of our relationships, the data we collect may be collected through the following contact points:
• Course on dedicated websites such as galeriedior.com and billetterie.galeriedior.com
• Exchanges with our advisers at the “30 Montaigne”
• Dior events in which you participate
• Relationship with our public relations services
• Contact with Customer Service
• Forms that you fill out (at the “30 Montaigne” or online)
• Digital applications with which you interact
• Third party data providers with whom you share information
• Retailers for whom you agree to receive our communications
• Satisfaction surveys or questionnaires to which you answer
We make sure to identify the personal data essential for the purpose for which it is collected by indicating it with an asterisk like this ‘(*)’ on each personal data collection form. If you do not fill in these mandatory fields, we will not be able to respond to your requests and / or provide you with the services requested. The other information is optional and allows us to know you better and improve our communications and services to you. Although not mandatory, we recommend that you fill them in to allow you to benefit from the best possible experience during our interactions with you.
Further information on how Dior collects your data can be found at the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link.
FOR WHAT PURPOSES is your data used by Dior?
We are required to use your data for purposes defined according to the nature of our relationships. Thus, depending on the context in which your data is collected, it may be used for one or more of the following purposes:
• Managing your orders in relation to Grand Montaigne goods or services
• Management of personalized content and Dior communications (digital or not)
• Managing your profile
• Managing your requests in connection with Dior
• The management of events in which you register / participate in relation for instance of the Grand Montaigne Gallery
• The management of our website and our digital applications in relation to Grand Montaigne goods or services
• Management and improvement of our products and services, image and reputation
• Transaction management (securing online payments, prevention of fraud, incidents related to payments and debts)
• Analysis and personalization purposes: with your explicit consent (when required), we use your personal data to send you personalized communications (newsletters, offers, invitations and surveys) and analyze your preferences and habits, anticipate your needs from of your consumer profile. We can make you benefit from our personalized communications by means of emails, postal letters, SMS or calls according to the communication preferences that you have indicated to us and your consumer profile (when authorized).
Further information on Dior processing activities can be found at the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link.
We ensure the legal basis for the processing of your data according to the purpose (s) concerned, which may be, depending on the context in which it is collected:
• Your explicit consent: for example, for the purposes of managing our personalized commercial offers, managing your browsing via cookies under the conditions defined by our Cookies Policy, or establishing your consumer profile in applicable cases;
• The implementation of a contract, for example for your access to your customer account, the processing and follow-up of your orders;
• A legal obligation when processing is required by law, for example, keeping purchase invoices to prevent fraud;
• Our legitimate interest: for example, to improve our products and services, defend ourselves or secure our tools
HOW LONG can we keep them?
We keep your personal data only for the time necessary for the purpose pursued. In general, your personal data is stored in a dedicated “30 Montaigne” database:
For the guests staying at the “30 Montaigne” Hotel: 5 years starting at the date of the check in.
For the customers of “30 Montaigne” Restaurant: 3 years starting at the date of the meal payment
For the visitors of the “30 Montaigne” Gallery: 3 years starting at the date of the Gallery visiting ticket issuance.
When we no longer need to use your personal data, it is deleted from our systems and our registers or made anonymous so that it can no longer be identified, subject to retention for archival purposes. claims and litigation management as well as to meet our legal and / or regulatory obligations and / or to respond to requests from authorities authorized to make the request
WHO can access your data?
Your data is intended for the services of Maison Christian Dior concerned by your requests. We ensure that only duly authorized persons can access your personal data when this is necessary for the aforementioned purposes.
We do not pass your data on to third parties for commercial purposes.
At high level, we are only required to communicate your information if necessary, and if possible in a form that does not allow direct identification to:
• Other Dior entities as well as department stores where you buy our products in order to provide you with identical personalized service worldwide
• Our trusted third-party providers, including other entities of the LVMH group, acting as subcontractors according to our instructions and on our behalf only.
For example, we entrust certain services to third parties responsible for delivering a product to you, payment service providers and transaction security against fraud, third parties who assist us in the organization of our events, third parties providing services IT, digital communication and public relations agencies, third parties who assist us in customer service, third parties who assist us in qualitative surveys of our products, programs or services.
• Third parties including the LVMH group wishing to know your preferences and consumption trends for our programs and services in order to improve visibility, accessibility and performance.
• Our trusted third party partners assist us in the management of your orders. In particular, we entrust certain services to third parties responsible for delivering a product to you, to payment service providers and to providers ensuring the security of anti-fraud transactions. Please note that these partners may act as data controllers; in this case, they have their own privacy policies.
Further information on how Dior shares your data can be found at the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link.
HOW do we protect and ensure the confidentiality of your data?
We take all the necessary precautions to guarantee the confidentiality and security of your data and to prevent it from being distorted, damaged, destroyed or from unauthorized third parties having access to it.
We ask our partners and group companies to maintain a level of protection similar to ours concerning your personal data. The security measures put in place are evaluated and updated to face new threats and new challenges, as well as new legal requirements in the countries where we operate.
HOW do we deal with cross-border protections?
Given the presence of Dior in many countries around the world and in order to provide you with personalized service worldwide, some of your data may be collected, accessible or stored outside your country of residence. You should be aware that data protection and security requirements differ from place to place and may not offer the same level of protection as those of your country of origin. However, Dior and our group companies have taken measures to guarantee an adequate level of protection of your data, regardless of their location.
Further information on how Dior processing handle data transfer can be found at the
generic Privacy Statement which can be reached at this link.
WHAT additional protections are provided for residents of certain regions?
Dior has adopted the data protection and security practices described in this privacy policy for all individuals concerned. In addition, we have also identified and taken into account the data protection and security measures required at local or regional level. This includes, for example, those required for residents of the European Union / European Economic Area under the General EU Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) 2016/679.
In particular, the GDPR provides the following rights:
• Right to information: you have the right to obtain clear, transparent and understandable information about how we use your personal data and about your rights. You will find all of this information in this policy
• Right of access: you have the right to access the personal data that Dior holds about you
• Right of rectification: you have the right to have your personal data rectified if it is inaccurate or obsolete and / or to supplement it if it is incomplete
• Right to erasure / right to be forgotten: you have the right to have your data erased or deleted. However, this right may be limited by a legal reason or our legitimate interest in keeping your personal data
• Right of opposition: you can at any time request to no longer receive our communications relating to our offers, news and events. You can in particular use the hypertext link provided for this purpose in each email or communication that we send to you. You can also request to receive non-personalized communications about our products and services
• Right to withdraw consent at any time for data processing based on consent: you can withdraw your consent relating to our processing of your data when this processing is based on consent
• Right to data portability: you have the right to move, copy or transfer data from our database to another. This right only applies to the data you have provided, and provided that the processing is based on a contract or your consent and carried out using automated processes
You, or one of your legally designated representatives, also have the right to formulate specific or general directives concerning the conservation, erasure and communication of your post-mortem data and this in application of the Law for a Digital Republic.
HOW to contact us ?
1 / Please contact us in the manner below if you wish to exercise these rights or if you have questions or complaints regarding the processing of your personal data.
Christian Dior Couture
-             By email at privacy@christiandior.com
-             By postal mail: Christian Dior Couture, 30 avenue Montaigne, 75008 Paris, France
2 / You also have the right to contact the Dior lead data protection authority, the CNIL, at any time, in
order to lodge a complaint against Dior's data protection and privacy practices. The CNIL can be contacted using the following information:
Commission Nationale de l’Informatique et les Libertés (CNIL)
3 Place de Fontenoy
TSA 80715 - 75334 Paris, Cedex 07
Phone. +33 1 53 73 22 22
Fax +33 1 53 73 22 00
Website: http://www.cnil.fr/
CHRISTIAN DIOR COUTURE - CANDIDATE PRIVACY STATEMENT
Statement relating to the protection of your personal data collected in the context of recruitment
This Privacy Statement for Candidates (hereinafter the “
Privacy Statement
”) is intended to provide visitors and users (“
You
”) of the www.dior.com website, as well as of all the Dior’s websites with .com, .it, .ru, .co, .jp, .cn domain names suffixes (hereinafter collectively the “
Website
”) with information relating to how the Maison Christian Dior Couture (hereinafter “
Christian Dior Couture
” or “
We/Us
”) processes your personal data (hereinafter the “
Personal Data
” or “
Data
”) and about your rights in this respect.
Christian Dior Couture places the highest priority and takes the utmost care to protect your Personal Data.
1. Who are we? Who is the Data Controller of your Personal data?
During your recruitment experience, and in order to inform you in advance, the Data Controller will be Christian Dior Couture within the meaning of the regulations applicable to personal data and in particular with regard to article 24 of the Regulations (EU) 2016/679 (hereinafter "GDPR").
As an example, referring to some of the Maison iconic products:
• Lady Dior bag
• 30 Montaigne bag
• Bar jacket
Christian Dior Couture SA
(head office), a public limited company under French law with its head office located at 30 avenue Montaigne, Paris 8, France, registered with the Paris Trade and Companies Register under number 612 035 832 and represented by Hien Tran Trung in his capacity as Administrative and Financial Director of Christian Dior Couture,
And all Christian Dior Couture affiliates
Christian Dior Couture is a story of dreams and elegance, passion and excellence; it is also a story of know-how. The creations of Christian Dior Couture express the passion for beautiful gestures and exceptional objects. From haute couture to ready-to-wear, including leather goods, watchmaking and jewelry, know-how is transformed into the art of making.
2. What is a “personal data”?
Personal Data refers to any information or pieces of information that could identify You either directly (
e.g.
your name, surname, email, home address, etc.) or indirectly (
e.g.
through pseudonymized data, such as a unique ID number, etc.). It may also include unique identifiers like your computer’s IP address.
3. Why and how do We use the Personal Data that We collect?
3.1 How do We collect your Personal Data?
We collect your Personal Data as follows:
directly from You
when You use our Website and our services (completion of various forms on the Website, direct communication with Us through our institutional departments, etc.);
automatically
when You access or use the Website (technical details, IP address, browsing information, etc.).
3.2 What Data do We collect?
We collect several types of Personal Data about You:
Personal Data that We collect directly from You
We collect Personal Data that You provide directly when You use our Website.
This is specifically the case when You:
interact with Us through the contact forms,
register to receive our newsletters or institutional documentation,
apply to job offers.
The categories of Personal Data that We collect include:
Identification and contact information:
e.g., last name, first name, mailing address, contact details needed to identify You when You interact with Us,
Application information:
e.g., last name, first name, email address, telephone number, professional experience and all the information You provide by sending your application and/or your curriculum vitae: photo, skills, education level, spoken languages, salary expectations, home address, hobbies, family status, etc.  We only collect and store this Data in connection with the management of our own job offers and do not use them for any other purposes, including for commercial purposes.
Personal Data that We collect automatically
We automatically collect certain Data about You when You access or use the Website, specifically:
Technical information
: We collect information about the device that You use to login, as well as your use of the Website (
g
., operating system, type of browser used, whether a proxy is used, location of the device inferred from your IP address that identifies your computer, access time, accessed pages and the link that enabled You to access our Website),
Browsing information: We use tracking technologies to collect Data about You when You use our Website.
3.3 On what legal grounds and for which purposes do We use the Data that We collect?
In accordance with current personal data protection regulations, We only collect Personal Data when We have a legal basis to do so.
Personal Data is collected either:
i.          based on pre-contractual measures
ii.          based on your consent,
iii.          in our legitimate interest, or
iv.          to meet our legal obligations.
(i) We collect your Personal Data on the basis of
pre-contractual measures
, in particular in the context of the processing of applications (CV and motivation letter) and management of interviews.
(ii) We collect Personal Data
based on your consent
, for the following purposes
:
Share opportunities
that can match your profile and keep you up to date on the life of Maison Dior,
(iii) We collect Personal Data
based on our legitimate interest
, for the following purposes:
·        to manage your requests and queries: We use your Data to send You the information You request,
to defend our interests
in the event of a dispute or court action
,
to manage cybersecurity
of the Website
,
to prevent fraudulent acts
in order to ensure the security of our assets and contents.
(iv) We may also store your Personal Data when
the law requires Us to do so or to defend our legal rights
.
3.4 Who has access to your Data?
3.4.1
Accessibility within Christian Dior Couture
Your Data is processed by the Christian Dior Couture for the purposes described above and are only accessible to Christian Dior Couture personnel who need to know it to perform their duties.
In this respect, your Personal Data is processed by the following departments of Christian Dior Couture and/or other Maisons of the LVMH Group:
Christian Dior Couture Institutional Communication Department and Financial Communication Department
for the management of your requests and queries, as well as to send You newsletters;
Christian Dior Couture Human Resources department
to manage your applications to job offers;
Christian Dior Couture Security Department
to manage cybersecurity of the Website;
Christian Dior Couture Fraud and Legal Departments
to manage fraudulent acts or legal claims if any.
3.4.2
Accessibility by third parties
Certain third parties may have access to your Data, specifically:
(i) our subcontractors and service providers
acting for technical and logistical reasons (carriers, Website hosting, security and maintenance providers, fraud management service providers, technical service providers responsible for sending e-mails and newsletters, anti-spam and anti-bot services, recruitment agencies which may provide Us with advice on the management of our candidates’ databases and help with the selection of profiles within such databases, etc.);
(ii) other LVMH Group affiliates for recruitment purposes
: when you apply to an LVMH Group affiliate’s job offer, this affiliate collects and processes your Data as independent data controller. In such case, your Data will be processed according to this affiliate’s personal data protection policy, which You may obtain by contacting it directly. Likewise, the rights You enjoy pursuant to personal data protection laws must be directly enforced against it;
(iii) any authority, court or other third party
when disclosure is required by law, regulations or a judicial decision, or if such disclosure is necessary to protect and defend our rights.
3.5 Is any Personal Data transferred outside of the European Economic Area?
Your Data is processed in France by the Maison Christian Dior Couture. However, We may rely on certain service providers, which are located abroad or which themselves rely on processors located abroad, including outside of the European Economic Area (EEA) in countries where personal data protection laws differ from those that apply in the EEA.
With reference to the data relating to applications, the LVMH Group has adopted binding corporate rules ("BCR") which the French Supervisory Authority (the CNIL) has declared to be compliant with current legislation and suitable for offering an adequate level. of protection in case of data transfer within the Group, also outside the European Economic Area.
3.6 How long do We store your Data?
Data is stored as long as required for the purpose for which it was collected and, in any case, will be destroyed at the end of such period.
Please see the list below for additional details about these periods.
Any transfer of your Data outside of the EEA will take place with appropriate safeguards in place that comply with applicable personal data protection regulations. Upon request, We will provide You with a copy of applicable safeguards.
Purpose:
Management of your requests and queries
Data categories: Identification Data (last name, first name, mailing address, contact details needed to identify You when You interact with Us).
Period of storage before erasure: Duration required to manage your requests and queries. Your Data will then be either deleted or anonymized, unless we need to keep it to meet our legal obligations for the applicable statutory retention period.
Purpose:
Sending You our newsletters
Data categories: Your email address
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of your subscription. Then, the Data will be destroyed or anonymized.
Purpose:
Management of your applications to job offers
Data categories: Application information
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of two (2) years from when the Data has been provided or from the last contact with You. At the end of this 2-year period, Christian Dior Couture may contact You to know whether You want Christian Dior Couture to keep retaining your Personal Data, for the purpose of informing You of an opportunity that may arise and match your career aspirations and skills. In any event, your Data will be erased at your request, within a maximum period of 1 month from your request.
Purpose:
Security of the Website
Data categories: Technical information of your device (IP address, device type, browser ID, etc.)
Period of storage before erasure: 6 months, then the Data is either deleted or anonymized.
Purpose:
Disputes/complaints
Data categories: Data concerning the dispute/complaint
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of the complaint + 5 years from the complaint.
In the event of a court action: duration of proceedings through full enforcement of the legal decision or settlement agreement
4. What are your rights in relation to your Data?
4.1
Access, rectification and portability
In accordance with current regulations, You have the right to access your Data. You may also request correction of Your Personal Data should they be inaccurate. Depending on the purpose of processing, You also have the right to have incomplete Personal Data completed.
To respond to your request, We may ask You to provide Us with a proof of your identity. We may also need to ask You for additional information or supporting documents. We will make every effort to respond to your request as soon as possible.
You may, to the extent provided for by law, exercise your right to Data portability which allows You to retrieve, in an interoperable format, the Personal Data that You provided to Us.
4.2
Right to erasure of your Data and to limitation of the processing of your Data
You may request erasure of your Personal Data if:
You believe that our processing of your Personal Data is no longer needed for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy,
You believe that the processing is unlawful or You contest the accuracy of the Data We process about You,
You withdrew your consent to the processing of your Data.
Alternatively, to the extent provided for by law, You may request limitation of the processing of your Data.
Please note that despite the exercise of your right to erasure or processing limitation, We will store some of Your Personal Data when the law requires Us to do so, or to exercise or defend our rights.
4.3
Right to establish instructions for the management of your Personal Data after your death
For France and when mandatory local provisions so provide, You may determine how You want Us to handle your Personal Data upon your death.
4.4
Procedure to exercise your Data protection rights
You can exercise your data protection rights in the following ways or if you have any questions or complaints about the processing of your personal data.
by using the following email address:
privacy@christiandior.com
by using the following contact form:
https://www.dior.com/en_us/contact-couture
by mail at the following address: Data Protection Officer, Christian Dior Couture, 11 bis rue François 1er, 75008 Paris, France.
You also have the right to contact Dior’s lead Supervisory Authority, the CNIL, at any time in order to file a complaint against Dior’s data protection and privacy practices. The CNIL can be contacted by using the following information:
Commission Nationale de l'Informatique et des Libertés – CNIL
3 Place de Fontenoy
TSA 80715 - 75334 Paris, Cedex 07
Phone. +33 1 53 73 22 22
Fax +33 1 53 73 22 00
Website:
http://www.cnil.fr/
We also wish to inform you about the contacts of other authorities in Europe that you can find and contact on the website of the European Data Protection Board:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
When the processing of your Data is based on your consent (
e.g
., subscription to the newsletter), You may withdraw your consent at any time without justification. This right can be exercised by changing your options regarding subscriptions to our newsletters by clicking on the hyperlink provided for this purpose in each email We send You.
5. How is your Personal Data secured?
Christian Dior Couture uses technical and organizational measures that comply with French and EU legal and regulatory requirements, to keep your Data secure and confidential. Under written agreements, Christian Dior Couture requires its service providers and processors to provide safeguards and implement sufficient security measures to protect the Personal Data they have agreed to process, in accordance with applicable requirements under personal data protection laws. However, Christian Dior Couture does not control all risks related to the operation of the Internet and draws your attention to the inherent risks of using any website.
6. Third party websites
There may be links to third-party websites (such as LVMH Group affiliates’ websites) that We do not control, and which are governed by their own confidentiality and personal data protection policies. This Privacy Statement does not apply to third-party websites. Please review the confidentiality and personal data protection policies of the third-party websites that You visit to understand how they process your Data. Christian Dior Couture shall not be liable for any use of your Data by any third parties.
PARFUMS CHRISTIAN DIOR - CANDIDATE PRIVACY STATEMENT
Statement relating to the protection of your personal data collected in the context of recruitment
This Privacy Statement for Candidates (hereinafter the “
Privacy Statement
”) is intended to provide visitors and users (“
You
”) of the www.dior.com website, as well as of all the Dior’s websites with .com, .it, .ru, .co, .jp, .cn domain names suffixes (hereinafter collectively the “
Website
”) with information relating to how the Maison Parfums Christian Dior (hereinafter “
Parfums
C
hristian Dior
” or “
We/Us
”) processes your personal data (hereinafter the “
Personal Data
” or “
Data
”) and about your rights in this respect.
Parfums Christian Dior places the highest priority and takes the utmost care to protect your Personal Data.
Who are we? Who is the Data Controller of your Personal data?
During your recruitment experience, and in order to inform you in advance, the Data Controller will be Parfums Christian Dior within the meaning of the regulations applicable to personal data and in particular with regard to article 24 of the Regulations (EU) 2016/679 (hereinafter "GDPR").
As an example, referring to some of the Maison iconic products:
J’adore
Miss Dior
Capture Total
Parfums Christian Dior S.A.
(head office), a public limited company under French law with its head office located at 33 avenue Hoche, Paris 8, France, registered with the Paris Trade and Companies Register under number 552 065 187 and represented by Laurent Kleitman in his capacity as President Director General Parfums Christian Dior,
And all Parfums Christian Dior affiliates
The Dior soul is expressed in each of the Maison's products and in the attention paid to each stage of their manufacture. From Grasse in Paris to the Jardins Dior, Parfums Christian Dior sublimates the finest materials so that each of its creations contributes to its aura around the world.
2. What is a “personal data”?
Personal Data refers to any information or pieces of information that could identify You either directly (
e.g.
your name, surname, email, home address, etc.) or indirectly (
e.g.
through pseudonymized data, such as a unique ID number, etc.). It may also include unique identifiers like your computer’s IP address.
3. Why and how do We use the Personal Data that We collect?
3.1 How do We collect your Personal Data?
We collect your Personal Data as follows:
directly from You
when You use our Website and our services (completion of various forms on the Website, direct communication with Us through our institutional departments, etc.);
automatically
when You access or use the Website (technical details, IP address, browsing information, etc.).
3.2 What Data do We collect?
We collect several types of Personal Data about You:
Personal Data that We collect directly from You
We collect Personal Data that You provide directly when You use our Website.
This is specifically the case when You:
interact with Us through the contact forms,
register to receive our newsletters or institutional documentation,
apply to job offers.
The categories of Personal Data that We collect include:
Identification and contact information:
e.g., last name, first name, mailing address, contact details needed to identify You when You interact with Us,
Application information:
e.g., last name, first name, email address, telephone number, professional experience and all the information You provide by sending your application and/or your curriculum vitae.  We only collect and store this Data in connection with the management of our own job offers and do not use them for any other purposes, including for commercial purposes.
Personal Data that We collect automatically
We automatically collect certain Data about You when You access or use the Website, specifically:
Technical information
: We collect information about the device that You use to login, as well as your use of the Website (
g
., operating system, type of browser used, whether a proxy is used, location of the device inferred from your IP address that identifies your computer, access time, accessed pages and the link that enabled You to access our Website),
Browsing information: We use tracking technologies to collect Data about You when You use our Website.
3.3 On what legal grounds and for which purposes do We use the Data that We collect?
In accordance with current personal data protection regulations, We only collect Personal Data when We have a legal basis to do so.
Personal Data is collected either:
i.          based on pre-contractual measures
ii.          based on your consent,
iii.          in our legitimate interest, or
iv.          to meet our legal obligations.
(i) We collect your Personal Data on the basis of
pre-contractual measures
, in particular in the context of the processing of applications (CV and motivation letter) and management of interviews.
(ii) We collect Personal Data
based on your consent
, for the following purposes
:
Share opportunities
that can match your profile and keep you up to date on the life of Maison Dior,
(iii) We collect Personal Data
based on our legitimate interest
, for the following purposes:
·        to manage your requests and queries: We use your Data to send You the information You request,
to defend our interests
in the event of a dispute or court action
,
to manage cybersecurity
of the Website
,
to prevent fraudulent acts
in order to ensure the security of our assets and contents.
(iv) We may also store your Personal Data when
the law requires Us to do so or to defend our legal rights
.
3.4 Who has access to your Data?
3.4.1
Accessibility within Parfums Christian Dior
Your Data is processed by the Maison Parfums Christian Dior for the purposes described above and are only accessible to Parfums Christian Dior personnel who need to know it to perform their duties.
In this respect, your Personal Data is processed by the following departments of the Maison Parfums Christian Dior and/or other Maisons of the LVMH Group:
Parfums Christian Dior Institutional Communication Department and Financial Communication Department
for the management of your requests and queries, as well as to send You newsletters;
Parfums Christian Dior Human Resources department
to manage your applications to job offers;
Parfums Christian Dior Security Department
to manage cybersecurity of the Website;
Parfums Christian Dior Fraud and Legal Departments
to manage fraudulent acts or legal claims if any.
3.4.2
Accessibility by third parties
Certain third parties may have access to your Data, specifically:
(i) our subcontractors and service providers
acting for technical and logistical reasons (carriers, Website hosting, security and maintenance providers, fraud management service providers, technical service providers responsible for sending e-mails and newsletters, anti-spam and anti-bot services, recruitment agencies which may provide Us with advice on the management of our candidates’ databases and help with the selection of profiles within such databases, etc.);
(ii) other LVMH Group affiliates for recruitment purposes
: when you apply to an LVMH Group affiliate’s job offer, this affiliate collects and processes your Data as independent data controller. In such case, your Data will be processed according to this affiliate’s personal data protection policy, which You may obtain by contacting it directly. Likewise, the rights You enjoy pursuant to personal data protection laws must be directly enforced against it;
(iii) any authority, court or other third party
when disclosure is required by law, regulations or a judicial decision, or if such disclosure is necessary to protect and defend our rights.
3.5 Is any Personal Data transferred outside of the European Economic Area?
Your Data is processed in France by the Maison Parfums Christian Dior. However, We may rely on certain service providers, which are located abroad or which themselves rely on processors located abroad, including outside of the European Economic Area (EEA) in countries where personal data protection laws differ from those that apply in the EEA.
With reference to the data relating to applications, the LVMH Group has adopted binding corporate rules ("BCR") which the French Supervisory Authority (the CNIL) has declared to be compliant with current legislation and suitable for offering an adequate level. of protection in case of data transfer within the Group, also outside the European Economic Area.
3.6 How long do We store your Data?
Data is stored as long as required for the purpose for which it was collected and, in any case, will be destroyed at the end of such period.
Please see the list below for additional details about these periods.
Any transfer of your Data outside of the EEA will take place with appropriate safeguards in place that comply with applicable personal data protection regulations. Upon request, We will provide You with a copy of applicable safeguards.
Purpose:
Management of your requests and queries
Data categories: Identification Data (last name, first name, mailing address, contact details needed to identify You when You interact with Us).
Period of storage before erasure: Duration required to manage your requests and queries. Your Data will then be either deleted or anonymized, unless we need to keep it to meet our legal obligations for the applicable statutory retention period.
Purpose:
Sending You our newsletters
Data categories: Your email address
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of your subscription. Then, the Data will be destroyed or anonymized.
Purpose:
Management of your applications to job offers
Data categories: Application information
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of two (2) years from when the Data has been provided or from the last contact with You. At the end of this 2-year period, Parfums Christian Dior may contact You to know whether You want Parfums Christian Dior to keep retaining your Personal Data, for the purpose of informing You of an opportunity that may arise and match your career aspirations and skills. In any event, your Data will be erased at your request, within a maximum period of 1 month from your request.
Purpose:
Security of the Website
Data categories: Technical information of your device (IP address, device type, browser ID, etc.)
Period of storage before erasure: 6 months, then the Data is either deleted or anonymized.
Purpose:
Disputes/complaints
Data categories: Data concerning the dispute/complaint
Period of storage before erasure: Duration of the complaint + 5 years from the complaint.
In the event of a court action: duration of proceedings through full enforcement of the legal decision or settlement agreement
4. What are your rights in relation to your Data?
4.1
Access, rectification and portability
In accordance with current regulations, You have the right to access your Data. You may also request correction of Your Personal Data should they be inaccurate. Depending on the purpose of processing, You also have the right to have incomplete Personal Data completed.
To respond to your request, We may ask You to provide Us with a proof of your identity. We may also need to ask You for additional information or supporting documents. We will make every effort to respond to your request as soon as possible.
You may, to the extent provided for by law, exercise your right to Data portability which allows You to retrieve, in an interoperable format, the Personal Data that You provided to Us.
4.2
Right to erasure of your Data and to limitation of the processing of your Data
You may request erasure of your Personal Data if:
You believe that our processing of your Personal Data is no longer needed for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy,
You believe that the processing is unlawful or You contest the accuracy of the Data We process about You,
You withdrew your consent to the processing of your Data.
Alternatively, to the extent provided for by law, You may request limitation of the processing of your Data.
Please note that despite the exercise of your right to erasure or processing limitation, We will store some of Your Personal Data when the law requires Us to do so, or to exercise or defend our rights.
4.3
Right to establish instructions for the management of your Personal Data after your death
For France and when mandatory local provisions so provide, You may determine how You want Us to handle your Personal Data upon your death.
4.4
Procedure to exercise your Data protection rights
Vous pouvez exercer vos droits en matière de protection des Données selon les modalités suivantes ou si vous avez des questions ou réclamations concernant le traitement de vos données personnelles.
by using the following email address:
gdpr_hr@diormail.com
by using the following contact form:
https://www.dior.com/en_gb/contact-parfum
by mail at the following address: Data Protection Officer, Parfums Christian Dior, 190 avenue Charles de Gaulle, 92200 Neuilly sur Seine, France.
You also have the right to contact Dior’s lead Supervisory Authority, the CNIL, at any time in order to file a complaint against Dior’s data protection and privacy practices. The CNIL can be contacted by using
the following information:
Commission Nationale de l'Informatique et des Libertés – CNIL
3 Place de Fontenoy
TSA 80715 - 75334 Paris, Cedex 07
Phone. +33 1 53 73 22 22
Fax +33 1 53 73 22 00
Website:
http://www.cnil.fr/
We also wish to inform you about the contacts of other authorities in Europe that you can find and contact on the website of the European Data Protection Board:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
When the processing of your Data is based on your consent (
e.g
., subscription to the newsletter), You may withdraw your consent at any time without justification. This right can be exercised by changing your options regarding subscriptions to our newsletters by clicking on the hyperlink provided for this purpose in each email We send You.
5. How is your Personal Data secured?
Parfums Christian Dior
uses technical and organizational measures that comply with French and EU legal and regulatory requirements, to keep your Data secure and confidential. Under written agreements,
Parfums Christian Dior
requires its service providers and processors to provide safeguards and implement sufficient security measures to protect the Personal Data they have agreed to process, in accordance with applicable requirements under personal data protection laws. However,
Parfums Christian Dior
does not control all risks related to the operation of the Internet and draws your attention to the inherent risks of using any website.
6. Third party websites
There may be links to third-party websites (such as LVMH Group affiliates’ websites) that We do not control, and which are governed by their own confidentiality and personal data protection policies. This Privacy Statement does not apply to third-party websites. Please review the confidentiality and personal data protection policies of the third-party websites that You visit to understand how they process your Data.
Parfums Christian Dior
shall not be liable for any use of your Data by any third parties.
Welcome to Dior.com
You are visiting us from Ireland, would you like to go to our Ireland website?
Go to United Kingdom
Confirm
Other countries/regions
We use cookies, including third party cookies, for operational purposes, statistical analyses, to personalize your experience, provide you with targeted content tailored to your interests and to analyze the performance of our advertising campaigns.
You can accept these cookies by clicking on "Accept all", or refuse them on "Reject All" or clicking on "Personalize my choices" to manage your preferences.
You can change your preferences at any time at the bottom of the Dior.com website.
For further information about cookie management,
please see dedicated section on the Dior.com site of your country of residence.
Reject All
Accept all
Personalize my choices
Privacy Preference Center
What is a cookie?
A cookie is a text file that can be stored in a dedicated space on the hard drive of your device (computer, tablet, smartphone, etc.) when you visit an online service using your browser. A cookie allows its sender to identify the device where it is registered for the validity period of your consent, which does not usually exceed 6 months.
For further information about cookie management,
please see dedicated section on the Dior.com site of your country of residence.
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting  Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are set by a range of social media services that we have added to the site to enable you to share our content with your friends and networks. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit. If you do not allow these cookies you may not be able to use or see these sharing tools.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 1
https://twitter.com/en/privacy:
Skip to main content
Privacy Policy
Privacy Settings
Privacy Center
Help Center
Policy Archive
Download PDF
X Privacy Policy
Effective: November 15, 2024
Before you scroll, read this
It’s really hard to make everyone happy with a Privacy Policy. Most people who use X want something short and easy to understand. While we wish we could fit everything you need to know into a post, our regulators ask us to meet our legal obligations by describing them all in a lot of detail.
With that in mind, we’ve written our Privacy Policy as simply as possible to empower you to make informed decisions when you use X by making sure you understand and have control over the information we collect, how it’s used, and when it’s shared.
So if you skip reading every word of the Privacy Policy, at least know this:
X is a public platform
Learn what’s viewable & searchable
We collect some data
about you
Learn what we collect & how
Affiliate services may have their own policies
Learn about affiliates
We use your data to make X better
Learn how we make your info work
You can control your experience
Learn how to update your settings
If you have questions about how we use data, just ask
Learn how to contact us
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
1. Information We Collect
The information we collect when you use X falls into three categories.
1.1 Information you provide us.
To use some of our products and services you need to have an account, and to create an account, you need to provide us certain information. Likewise, if you use our paid products and services, we cannot provide them to you without getting payment information. Basically, certain information is necessary if you want to use many of our products and services.
Personal Accounts.
If you create an account, you must provide us with some information so that we can provide our services to you. This includes a display name (for example, “Creators”); a username (for example, @XCreators); a password; an email address or phone number; a date of birth; your display language; and third-party single sign-in information (if you choose this sign-in method). You can also choose to share your location in your profile and posts, and to upload your address book to X to help find people you may know. Your profile information, which includes your display name and username, is always public, but you can use either your real name or a pseudonym. And remember, you can create multiple X accounts, for example, to express different parts of your identity, professional or otherwise.
Professional Accounts.
If you create a
professional account
, you also need to provide us with a professional category, and may provide us with other information, including street address, contact email address, and contact phone number, all of which will always be public.
Payment Information.
In order to purchase ads or other offerings provided as part of our paid products and services you will need to provide us payment information, including your credit or debit card number, card expiration date, CVV code, and billing address.
Preferences.
When you set your preferences using your
settings
, we collect that information so that we can respect your preferences.
Biometric Information.
Based on your consent, we may collect and use your biometric information for safety, security, and identification purposes.
Job Applications / Recommendations.
We may collect and use your personal information (such as your biographical information, employment history, educational history, employment preferences, skills and abilities, and job search activity and engagement, in addition to the information we already collect as disclosed in the “Information we collect when you use X” section of our Privacy Policy below) to recommend potential jobs to you, to share with potential employers when you apply for a job, to enable connections for professional opportunities, and to show you more relevant advertising.
1.2 Information we collect when you use X.
When you use our services, we collect information about how you use our products and services. We use that information to provide you with products and services, to help keep X more secure and respectful for everyone, and more relevant to you.
Usage Information.
We collect information about your activity on X, including:
Posts and other content you post (including the date, application, and version of X) and information about your broadcast activity (e.g., Spaces), including broadcasts you’ve created and when you created them, your lists, bookmarks, and Communities you are a part of.
Your interactions with other users’ content, such as reposts, likes, bookmarks, shares, downloads, replies, if other users mention or tag you in content or if you mention or tag them, and broadcasts you’ve participated in (including your viewing history, listening, commenting, speaking, and reacting).
How you interact with others on the platform, such as people you follow and people who follow you, metadata related to
Encrypted Messages
, and when you use
Direct Messages
, including the contents of the messages, the recipients, and date and time of messages.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will collect information about the communication and its content.
We collect information on links you interact with across our services (including in our emails sent to you).
Purchase and payments.
To allow you to make a payment or send money using X features or services, including through an intermediary, we may receive information about your transaction such as when it was made, when a subscription is set to expire or auto-renew, and amounts paid or received.
Device Information.
We collect information from and about the devices you use to access X, including:
Information about your connection, such as your IP address, browser type, and related information.
Information about your device and its settings, such as device and advertising ID, operating system, carrier, language, memory, apps installed, and battery level.
Your device address book, if you’ve chosen to share it with us.
Location Information.
When you use X, we collect some information about your approximate location to provide the service you expect, including showing you relevant ads. You can also choose to share your current precise location or places where you’ve previously used X by enabling these settings in your account.
Inferred Identity.
We may collect or receive information that we use to infer your identity as detailed below:
When you sign into X on a browser or device, we will associate that browser or device with your account. Subject to your settings, we may also associate your account with browsers or devices other than those you use to sign into X (or associate your signed-out device or browser with other browsers or devices or X-generated identiﬁers).
When you provide other information to X, including an email address or phone number, we associate that information with your X account. Subject to your settings, we may also use this information in order to infer other information about your identity, for example by associating your account with hashes of email addresses that share common components with the email address you have provided to X.
When you access X and are not signed in, we may infer your identity based on the information we collect.
Log Information.
We may receive information when you view content on or otherwise interact with our products and services, even if you have not created an account or are signed out, such as:
IP address and related information; browser type and language; operating system; the referring webpage; access times; pages visited; location; your mobile carrier; device information (including device and application IDs); search terms and IDs (including those not submitted as queries); ads shown to you on X; X-generated identiﬁers; and identiﬁers associated with cookies. We also receive log information when you click on, view, or interact with links on our services, including when you install another application through X.
Advertisements.
When you view or interact with ads we serve on or oﬀ X, we may collect information about those views or interactions (e.g., watching a video ad or preroll, clicking on an ad, interacting with reposts of or replies to an ad).
Cookies and similar technologies.
Like many websites, we use cookies and similar technologies to collect additional website usage data and to operate our services. Cookies are not required for many parts of our products and services such as searching and looking at public proﬁles. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
Interactions with our content on third-party sites.
When you view our content on third-party websites that integrate X content, such as embedded timelines or post buttons, we may receive log information that includes the web page you visited.
1.3 Information we receive from third parties.
When you use other online products and services, they may share information about that usage with us.
Ad Partners, Developers, Publishers.
Our ad and business partners share information with us such as browser cookie IDs, X-generated identifiers,
mobile device IDs, hashed user information like email addresses, demographic or interest data, and content viewed or actions taken on a website or app. Some of our ad partners, particularly our advertisers, also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives,
generates, or infers
about you described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy.
Other Third Parties, Account Connections, and Integrations.
We may receive information about you from third parties who are not our ad partners, such as other X users, developers, and partners who help us evaluate the safety and quality of content on our platform, our
corporate affiliates
, and other services you link to your X account. You may choose to connect your X account to your account on another service, and that other service may send us information about your account on that service.
2. How We Use Information
Breaking down how we use the information we collect is not simple because of the way the systems that bring our services to you work. For example, the same piece of information may be used differently for different purposes to ultimately deliver a single service. We think it’s most useful to describe the five main ways we use information and if you have questions that are not answered, you can always
contact us
. Here we go:
2.1 Operate, improve, and personalize our services.
We use the information we collect to provide and operate X products and services. We also use the information we collect to improve and personalize our products and services so that you have a better experience on X, including by showing you more relevant content and ads, suggesting people and topics to follow, enabling and helping you discover
affiliates
, third-party apps, and services. We may use the information we collect and publicly available information to help train our machine learning or artificial intelligence models for the purposes outlined in this policy.
We may use the information we collect from accounts of other services that you choose to connect to your X account to provide you features like cross-posting or cross-service authentication, and to operate our services.
We use your contact information to help others find your account if your settings permit, including through third-party services and client applications.
We use your information to provide our advertising and sponsored content services subject to your
settings
, which helps make ads on X more relevant to you. We also use this information to measure the effectiveness of ads and to help recognize your devices to serve you ads on and off of X. Some of our ad partners also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives, generates, or infers about you, as described elsewhere in our Privacy Policy.
2.2  Foster safety and security.
We use information we collect to provide for the safety and security of our users, our products, services, and your account. This includes verifying your identity, authenticating your account, and defending against fraud, unauthorized use, and illegal activity. We also use the information to evaluate and affect the safety and quality of content on X - this includes investigating and enforcing our policies and and terms, as well as applicable law.
2.3 Measure, analyze and make our services better.
We use the information we collect to measure and analyze the effectiveness of our products and services and to better understand how you use them in order to make them better.
2.4 Communicate with you about our services.
We use the information we collect to communicate with you about our products and services, including about product updates and changes to our policies and terms. If you’re open to hearing from us, we may also send you marketing messages from time to time.
2.5 Research.
We use information you share with us, or that we collect to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
3. Sharing Information
You should know the ways we share your information, why we share it, and how you can control it. There are five general ways we share your information.
3.1 When you post and share.
With the general public
. You are directing us to disclose that information as broadly as possible. X content, including your profile information (e.g., name/pseudonym, username, profile pictures), is available for viewing by the general public. The public does not need to be signed in to view some content on X. They may also find X content off of X: for example, from search query results on Internet search engines or videos downloaded and reshared elsewhere (depending on your
settings
).
With other X users.
Depending on your
settings
, and based on the X products and services you use, we share:
Your interactions with X content of other users, such as replies, and people you follow.
Content you send to a specific X user, such as through
Direct Messages
. Please keep in mind that if you’ve shared information like Direct Messages or protected posts with someone else who accesses X through a third-party service, the information may be shared with the third-party service.
With partners.
Depending on your
settings
, we also provide certain third parties with information to help us offer or operate our products and services. You can learn more about these partnerships in our
Help Center
. You can control whether X shares your personal information with these partners by using the “Data sharing with business partners” option in your
Privacy & Safety settings
. (This setting does not control sharing described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, such as when we share information with our service providers, or through partnerships other than as described in this
Help Center
article.)
3.2 With third parties & third-party integrations.
With service providers.
We may share your information with our
service providers
that perform functions and provide services on our behalf, including payment services providers who facilitate payments; service providers that host our various blogs and wikis; service providers that help us understand the use of our services; applicant tracking system providers to send and receive applicant and job data to potential employers; and those that provide fraud detection services.
With advertisers.
Advertising revenue enables us to provide our products and services. Advertisers may learn information from your engagement with their ads on or off X. For example, if you click on an external link or ad on our services, that advertiser or website operator might figure out that you came from X, along with other information associated with the ad you clicked, such as characteristics of the audience it was intended to reach and other X-generated identifiers for that ad. They may also collect other personal information from you, such as cookie identifiers, or your IP address.
Third-party content & integrations.
We share or disclose your information with your consent or at your direction, such as when you
authorize a third-party web client or application
to access your account or when you direct us to share your feedback with a business. Similarly, to improve your experience, we work with third-party partners to display their video content on X or to allow cross-platform sharing. When you watch or otherwise interact with content from our video or cross-platform sharing partners, they may receive and process your personal information as described in their privacy policies. For video content, you can adjust your
autoplay settings
if you prefer that content not to play automatically.
Third-party collaborators.
Depending on your
settings
, or if you decide to share your data, we may share or disclose your information with third parties. If you do not opt out, in some instances the recipients of the information may use it for their own independent purposes in addition to those stated in X’s Privacy Policy, including, for example, to train their artificial intelligence models, whether generative or otherwise.
Through our APIs.
We use technology like
APIs
and embeds to make public X information available to websites, apps, and others for their use, for example, displaying posts on a news website or analyzing what people say on X. We generally make this content available in limited quantities for free and charge licensing fees for large-scale access. We have
standard terms
that govern how this information can be used, and a compliance program to enforce these terms. But these individuals and companies are not affiliated with X, and their offerings may not reflect updates you make on X. For more information about how we make public data on X available to the world, visit
https://developer.x.com
.
3.3 When required by law, to prevent harm, or in the public interest.
We may preserve, use, share, or disclose your information if we believe that it is reasonably necessary to:
comply with a law, regulation,
legal process, or governmental request
;
protect the safety of any person, protect the safety or integrity of our platform, including to help prevent spam, abuse, or malicious actors on our services;
explain why we have removed content or accounts from our services (e.g., for a violation of
our Rules
);
address fraud, security, or technical issues; or
protect our rights or property, or the rights or property of those who use our services.
We may also use different signals and your data to infer, preserve, use, share, or disclose your age and identity information in order to comply with regulatory requirements as well as for safety, security, fraud, know-your-customer, know-your-business, and identity verification, as the case may be. We may also share or disclose your age and identity information with our partners, service providers, and others for these purposes.
3.4 With our Affiliates.
We may share information amongst our
affiliates
to provide our products and services.
3.5 As a result of a change in ownership.
We may share, sell, or transfer information about you in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization, sale of assets, or bankruptcy. This Privacy Policy will apply to your personal information that is shared with (before and after the close of any transaction) or transferred to the new entity.
4. How Long We Keep Information
We keep different types of information for different periods of time, depending on how long we need to retain it in order to provide you with our products and services, to comply with our legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
We keep your profile information, such as your display name, user name, password and email address for the duration of your account. We cannot provide you with our products and services without retaining this information.
We keep your usage information, such as the content you post, your interactions with other users’ content and how you interact with others on the platform for the duration of your account or until such content is removed.
We keep your payment information, including your credit or debit card number and billing address for the duration you use our paid products and services. Records of transactions will be kept for longer, in accordance with applicable law.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will keep information about the communication and its content for up to 18 months, unless it is necessary for us to retain it for a longer period to comply with our legal obligations or to exercise or defend our legal rights.
We generally collect device information, location information, inferred identity information and log information using cookies. We keep cookies and information collected using cookies for up to 13 months. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
We keep information about your views or interactions with ads on or off X, as well as how you interact with our content on third-party sites for up to 90 days.
We keep information shared by ad and business partners for up to 90 days.
Where you violate our Rules and your account is suspended, we may keep the identifiers you used to create the account (such as your email address or phone number) indefinitely to prevent repeat policy offenders from creating new accounts.
We may need to keep certain information longer than our policies specify in order to comply with legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
To comply with a law, regulation, legal process or governmental request.
Including in order to adhere to a legally appropriate preservation request made by law enforcement. You can read more about law enforcement access
here
.
In connection with legal claims, litigation and regulatory matters.
Including where it is reasonably necessary to retain information relating to your account in order to defend X against legal claims.
To maintain the safety and security of our products and services.
Including where it is necessary to store your information longer in order to investigate and fight abuse on our products and services.
Remember public content can exist elsewhere even after it is removed from X. For example, search engines and other third parties may retain copies of your posts longer, based upon their own privacy policies, even after they are deleted or expire on X. You can read more about search visibility
here
.
5. Take Control
5.1 Access, Correction, Portability.
You can access, correct, or modify the information you provided to us by editing your profile and adjusting your account
settings
.
You can learn more about the information we have collected or inferred about you in
Your X Data
and request access to additional information
here
.
You can download a copy of your information, such as your posts, by following the instructions
here
.
To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with a deletion, portability, or other related request. We may, in certain situations, reject your request for access, correction, or portability, for example, we may reject access where you are unable to verify your identity.
5.2 Deleting your Information.
If you follow the instructions
here
, your account will be deactivated and your data will be queued for deletion. When deactivated, your X account, including your display name, username, and public profile, will no longer be viewable on X.com, X for iOS, and X for Android. For up to 30 days after deactivation it is still possible to restore your X account if it was accidentally or wrongfully deactivated.
5.3 Objecting to, Restricting, or Withdrawing your Consent.
You can manage your privacy settings and other account features
here
. If you change your settings it may take some time for your choices to be fully reflected throughout our systems. You may also notice changes in your X experience or limitations in your ability to access certain features depending on the settings you’ve adjusted. You may also manage additional settings when interacting with certain content and features on different parts of the platform, such as whether a
Space
is recorded, or whether
videos you upload
are downloadable by others.
5.4 Authorized Agent Requests.
To submit a request related to access, modification, or deletion of your information, or someone else’s information if you are their authorized agent, you may also contact us as specified in the How To Contact X section of our Privacy Policy below. We may require you to provide additional information for verification.
6. Your Rights and Ours
We provide X to people all over the world and provide many of the same privacy tools and controls to all of our users regardless of where they live. However, your experience may be slightly different than users in other countries to ensure X respects local requirements.
6.1 We have specific legal bases to use your information.
X has carefully considered the legal reasons it is permitted to collect, use, share and otherwise process your information. If you want to dig in to learn more and better understand the nuances, we’d encourage you to check out
this additional information about data processing
. And no, we don’t sell your personal information.
6.2 We move your data to make X work for you.
Just as you use X to seamlessly participate in global conversations with people in countries all over the world, X must move information across borders and to different countries around the world to support the safe and reliable service you depend on. For example, if you live in Europe and are having a conversation with someone in the United States, information has to move between those countries to provide that experience – it’s what you expect from us.
We also use data centers and cloud providers, and engage
our affiliates
and third-party partners and
service providers
located in many parts of the world to help us provide our services. Before we move data between countries we look at the risks that may be presented to the data and rely on
standard contractual clauses
(SCCs), where applicable, to ensure your data rights are protected. To request a copy of the SCCs, please contact us
here
. If data will be shared with a third party, we require them to maintain the same protections over your data that we provide directly.
X is a
participant
in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF. X complies with the DPF Principles for all its processing of personal data received from the European Union, Switzerland and the UK, in reliance on the EU-US DPF, Swiss-US DPF and UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, respectively. If you have an inquiry or complaint related to our participation in the DPF, please contact us
here
. As part of our participation in the DPF, if you have a dispute with us about our adherence to the DPF Principles, we will seek to resolve it through our internal complaint resolution process, alternatively through the US-based independent dispute resolution body
JAMS
, and under certain conditions, through the DPF Arbitration Process following the procedures and subject to the conditions described in
Annex 1
to the DPF Principles. DPF participants are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission and other authorized statutory bodies. Under certain circumstances, participants may be liable for the transfer of personal data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to third parties outside the EU, Switzerland and the UK. Learn more about the EU-US DPF, the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF
here
.
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
The most current version of this Privacy Policy governs our processing of your personal data and we may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time as needed.
If we do revise this Privacy Policy and make changes that are determined by us to be material, we will provide you notice and an opportunity to review the revised Privacy Policy before you continue to use X.
9. General
The X Privacy Policy is written in English but is made available in multiple languages through translations. X strives to make the translations as accurate as possible to the original English version. However, in case of any discrepancies or inconsistencies, the English language version of the X Privacy Policy shall take precedence. You acknowledge that English shall be the language of reference for interpreting and constructing the terms of the X Privacy Policy.
10. How To Contact X
We want to hear from you if you have thoughts or questions about this Privacy Policy. You can contact us via our
Privacy Policy Inquiries
page or by writing to us at the appropriate address below.
Information about our handling of California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) requests is available
here
. Information about our handling of “Consumer Health Data” and associated requests as defined under Washington State’s My Health My Data Act and other similar state laws is available
here
.
If you live in the United States or any other country outside of the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is X Corp., with an address of:
X Corp.
Attn: Privacy Policy Inquiry
865 FM 1209, Building 2
Bastrop, TX 78602
If you live in the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is Twitter International Unlimited Company, with an address of:
Twitter International Unlimited Company
Attn: Data Protection Officer
One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street
Dublin 2, D02 AX07 IRELAND
If you live in Switzerland, you can also contact our appointed representative at the following address:
Twitter Switzerland GmbH
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Wasag Treuhand AG
Bolligenstrasse 18
Bern, 3006, SWITZERLAND
If you wish to raise a concern about our
data processing practices
, you have the right to do so with your local supervisory authority or Twitter International Unlimited Company’s lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, using the
contact details
listed on their website.
View previous policies
Take control of your privacy
Adjust your settings
Did someone say … cookies?
X and its partners use cookies to provide you with a better, safer and
  faster service and to support our business. Some cookies are necessary to use
  our services, improve our services, and make sure they work properly.
Show more about your choices
.
Accept all cookies
Refuse non-essential cookies
Sub-policy 2
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en#infocollect:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 3
https://weborama.com/en/weborama-privacy-commitment/:
No Results Found
The page you requested could not be found. Try refining your search, or use the navigation above to locate the post.